                              85 of 994 DOCUMENTS

            Copyright (c) 2004 Temple University of the Commonwealth
                           System of Higher Education
                               Temple Law Review

                                   Fall, 2004

                              77 Temp. L. Rev. 705

LENGTH: 25429 words

ARTICLE: AN EXAMINATION OF THE RIGHT OF HOSPITALS TO ENGAGE IN ECONOMIC
CREDENTIALING

NAME: Beverly Cohen*

BIO: * Professor of Law, Albany Law School at Union University. The author
wishes to thank Mirelle Varnovitsky for research support and both Theresa
Colbert and Donna Parent for technical support.

TEXT:
 [*705]

   Introduction

 Hospitals have historically engaged in the practice of "credentialing"
physicians before granting them staff privileges. The process of credentialing
entails examining the professional record of a physician to ensure that the
[*706]  physician is competent to practice. n1 This protects both the hospital
and its patients by assuring that the physicians with staff privileges have met
the quality standards that the hospital has established. n2 More recently,
however, some hospitals have begun to consider not only criteria related to
quality of care in credentialing physicians, but also criteria related to the
economic performance of the physicians. This practice has become known as "
economic credentialing." n3

   The recent filing of several court cases challenging economic credentialing
signals a renewed focus on this practice. In each of these new cases, hospitals
terminated physicians' staff privileges because the physicians had ownership
interests in competing facilities. The terminations followed the hospitals'
adoption of a "conflict of interest policy," whereby the hospitals declared that
they will consider such competing interests when they grant or renew staff
privileges. The plaintiff physicians assert variously that their terminations
violate state or federal antitrust laws, breach the hospitals' bylaws, violate
the physicians' rights to due process, and offend notions of public policy. n4
In one of these cases, the plaintiff physicians assert that the hospitals'
termination of the physicians' practice privileges due to the physicians'
investments in a competing facility violates the fraud and abuse laws. These
physicians argue that the hospitals are, in effect, conditioning staff
privileges upon referrals, which the physicians contend violates the federal and
state anti-kickback statutes. n5

   Parts I through IV of this Article will review the issue of economic
credentialing and provide an update on recent activity related to this
controversial practice. These introductory Parts will define the term "economic
credentialing" and discuss the polarized views toward it by physicians and
hospitals. These Parts of the Article will also examine market trends that may
have contributed to the practice, and look at the most recent form of economic
credentialing, known as "competitive credentialing."

    [*707]  Next, Part V of the Article will examine the cases wherein
physicians challenged hospitals' use of economic credentialing. This Part will
look at three categories of cases: (1) where the hospitals utilized economic
criteria related to quality (generally the overutilization cases), (2) where the
hospitals used economic criteria related to the hospitals' administrative needs
(generally the exclusive contracting or closed staff cases), and (3) where
hospitals utilized economic criteria related to competitive concerns (the
conflict of interest cases). This examination of the case law will reveal that
on the judicial front, the hospitals have fared much better than the physicians.
Whether the physicians' claims were stated in terms of antitrust, breach of
contract, or public policy, courts have allowed the physicians to block the
hospitals' use of economic credentialing only in narrow circumstances.

   This Article will next examine two additional factors that facilitate
hospitals' ability to engage in economic credentialing. Part VI will examine
instances where states have passed laws that address economic credentialing,
observing that none of these laws flatly prohibits the practice. More often,
these laws sanction the practice, either generally or when the economic
credentialing complies with the factors set forth in the particular statute.
Part VII will address two reports on specialty hospitals, recently published by
the United States General Accounting Office ("GAO"), which tend to show that
specialty hospitals admit only the most profitable surgery cases. This finding
supports concerns that general hospitals have expressed over "economic dumping,"
whereby physician owners of competing facilities retain the profitable cases and
refer only the less profitable cases to general hospitals.

   Finally, Part VIII of this Article will focus on the most recent challenge to
economic credentialing - that it violates the fraud and abuse laws. This Part
will examine the recent solicitation of comments on the issue by the Office of
the Inspector General ("OIG"), and will analyze whether a hospital's use of
competitive criteria in credentialing violates the federal anti-kickback
statute. Ultimately, this Article will conclude that, like the other legal
challenges to economic credentialing, competitive credentialing has a potential
to violate the fraud and abuse laws only in narrow circumstances.

   Based upon all of the above, the picture that emerges is that, to a large
extent, there are few legal impediments to hospitals' use of economic criteria
in credentialing and that courts even tolerate competitive credentialing in the
form of conflict of interest policies. The only three areas of risk appear to be
(1) antitrust claims asserted against a hospital with market power, where the
hospital's use of economic credentialing forecloses competition or harms
consumers; (2) breach of contract claims asserted against a hospital where the
hospital's application of a conflict of interest policy to current staff members
breaches the credentialing procedures guaranteed by the medical staff bylaws;
and (3) fraud and abuse claims asserted against a hospital where the hospital
has expressly conditioned staff privileges upon a mandated volume or value of
[*708]  referrals. If these risk areas are avoided, hospitals are generally able
to consider economic criteria when they make credentialing decisions.

   I. A Definition of "Economic Credentialing"

 There are various definitions of what it means to engage in economic
credentialing. The American Hospital Association ("AHA") has adopted a broad
definition of economic credentialing as the consideration of any factors that
are not related to quality. n6 Others have refined the term, referring to
"mixed" or "hybrid" economic credentialing as the consideration of economic
criteria that are intertwined with quality considerations. n7 These would
include such indicators as malpractice experience, which can indicate higher
costs due to findings of liability for negligent care, and also has a direct
relation to the quality of the physician's performance. n8 Some have referred to
the average length of stay, which is the average number of days that a physician
recommends that an inpatient with a particular diagnosis remain hospitalized, as
another hybrid criterion. n9 Longer lengths of stay raise the costs of the
hospitalization, thereby relating to economy. But longer lengths of stay may
also indicate overutilization, or the rendering of unnecessary medical care, if
physicians are recommending lengths of stay that far exceed the norm for similar
admissions by other like physicians practicing in the area, thereby relating to
quality. n10 Other suggested hybrid criteria, which potentially indicate both
inefficient practice as well as quality concerns, are excessive and redundant
testing, excessive denial letters from third party payers, and excessive
outpatient service utilization. n11

    [*709]  In contrast to hybrid economic indicators that relate to both
economy and quality, the term "pure" economic credentialing refers to
considerations of economic factors that have no relation to quality at all. n12
Some have suggested that criteria indicative of pure economic credentialing
include the dollar value of ancillary services a physician orders from the
hospital, compared to the dollar value of such services ordered by other
physicians with staff privileges. n13 Another example of a pure economic
indicator is whether the physician's patient mix is beneficial to the hospital,
in other words, whether the physicians' patients are primarily covered by
Medicaid, where reimbursements to the hospital are typically low, or primarily
covered by private insurance, where reimbursements to the hospital are generally
higher. n14

   While there appears to be agreement on which credentialing criteria have an
economic component, there is no consensus on which criteria are indicative of
pure economic credentialing. Both the Medical Society of the State of New York
("MSSNY") and the California Medical Association ("CMA") have developed lists of
economic criteria that are also indicative of quality versus criteria that are
purely economic. n15 However, the associations do not agree on how to classify
some of the criteria. For example, while the CMA believes that length of stay is
clearly pertinent to measuring quality, MSSNY believes that this criterion could
be purely economic in certain circumstances. n16

[*710]

   II. The Debate over Economic Credentialing

 Hospitals and physicians clearly have taken opposite sides in the debate over
whether hospitals should be permitted to engage in economic credentialing.
Physicians have become accustomed to having access to their patients no matter
which hospitals the patients select, and to obtaining staff privileges from the
hospitals in their geographic practice area upon satisfactorily completing the
necessary credentialing applications. n17 In fact, hospitals have encouraged
physicians to become staff members and have freely granted staff privileges, due
to the increased likelihood that the hospitals would benefit from a larger
number of physician referrals. n18 Not only did hospitals make it comparatively
easy to fulfill the credentialing requirements, but also many courts held that
as "quasi-public" institutions, hospitals were obligated to grant staff
privileges to physicians, as long as the physicians met the baseline quality
requirements. n19 And in a real sense, physicians needed to be affiliated with
the hospitals in their practice area in order to provide complete care to their
patients in need of inpatient services. n20

   Accordingly, most physicians are very concerned when new limitations are
placed upon their ability to obtain hospital privileges. With regard to economic
credentialing, physicians generally believe that it is unethical for hospitals
to put their economic "bottom lines" before patient care and that it is
inappropriate to deny staff privileges to physicians for purely economic
reasons. n21 Moreover, physicians assert that being denied staff privileges can
amount to a foreclosure of their rights to practice medicine in a given area and
restricts the patients' freedom to choose their attending physicians when they
become inpatients. n22  [*711]  MSSNY has argued on behalf of its membership
that purely economic criteria should not be used in credentialing decisions.
MSSNY asserts that credentialing "should be based solely on issues of
competency, training and quality of patient care" and that there is a "need to
prevent economic considerations from affecting medical determinations regarding
quality care." n23

   Physicians also have expressed concerns over hospitals' decisions to enter
into exclusive contracts with providers for particular services and decisions by
hospitals to close their staffs to additional doctors. The basis for physicians'
concerns is that these practices automatically foreclose certain physicians from
obtaining or retaining staff privileges at the hospitals. n24 Physicians have
most vehemently opposed such staff limitations where the decisions were driven
by financial, as opposed to quality, considerations. n25

   Not surprisingly, hospitals take the opposite view of economic credentialing.
They contend that, as competition for lower cost medical care has intensified
over the past two decades, n26 hospitals have been forced to consider economic
criteria in selecting the physicians who will treat hospital inpatients. n27
Managed care plans ostensibly select the hospitals that will participate in the
plans' networks based upon both quality and efficiency. n28 As the physicians
practicing  [*712]  in the hospitals largely influence the economics of the
hospitals, n29 hospitals contend that they are compelled to consider the
economics of the physicians with whom the hospitals will affiliate. n30 In fact,
some commentators have even suggested that a hospital's board of directors that
fails to consider the economics of its staff physicians might be in derogation
of the board's fiduciary duty to prudently manage the financial well-being of
the hospital. n31

   III. Factors That Have Led to the Practice of Economic Credentialing

 More recent changes in the healthcare marketplace have intensified the debate.
Probably the most compelling difference between the markets for hospital
services that existed twenty years ago and those markets today is the fact that
many physicians have begun to compete directly with hospitals. As physicians'
reimbursement became controlled largely by managed care plans, either through
physician fee schedules developed by the plans or by the plans' requirements
that physicians assume economic risk, n32 physicians have sought to establish
other means of retaining or increasing their income levels. n33 This has led to
the increased development of physician-controlled ventures to perform  [*713]
services that hospitals exclusively used to provide; these ventures include
physician-owned freestanding cardiac catheterization labs, diagnostic centers,
and ambulatory surgery centers. n34 The latest, most controversial, entrants to
the marketplace are physician-owned specialty hospitals, which perform a limited
range of surgeries, both inpatient and outpatient. n35 The existence of these
physician-controlled facilities means that certain physicians seeking to obtain
or renew staff privileges at a hospital may have an ownership interest in a
facility that is competing directly with the hospital. The competition is
intensified because the procedures that the physician-controlled facility
performs often are the most lucrative procedures that the hospital performs. n36
As the physician-owned facility draws the more profitable cases away from the
hospital, the hospital may find itself unable to subsidize the less profitable
aspects of its services, such as pediatrics or emergency care, which are
exceedingly important from a community service point of view. n37 Also, this
competition sharpens a hospital's concerns over extending staff privileges to
physicians with inefficient practice patterns.

   At the same time that hospitals perceived the need for economic
credentialing, the technological capability to perform economic credentialing
was also developing. The American Hospital Association found, in a 1989 survey
of 3,400 hospital CEOs, that most of the surveyed hospitals already had the
capability to do economic credentialing and that virtually all of those surveyed
CEOs anticipated that their hospitals would develop the capability to merge
physicians' clinical and financial data within the next five years. n38 Some
speculate that hospitals currently have available to them a number of computer
software packages that enable the hospitals to link physicians' clinical
outcomes  [*714]  with cost or charge data, thereby enabling economic
credentialing. n39

   But certainly the most compelling change in the healthcare marketplace, felt
by both physicians and hospitals alike, is the revolutionary growth of managed
care and its focus on cost along with quality. n40 Managed care plans typically
select participating providers and facilities based upon the providers' and
facilities' demonstrated ability to deliver high quality patient services while
controlling cost. n41 Thus, the predominance of managed care plans, which are
the gatekeepers to patients and reimbursement dollars, has ratcheted up the
intensity of hospitals' efforts to curb costs. n42

   Interestingly, under the federal antitrust law, physicians who form their own
joint ventures have found themselves required to track the efficiencies of the
ventures' participating physicians, either as a consequence of assuming
financial risk to achieve antitrust "safe harbor" status, or as a critical
component of "clinical integration" to allow the joint venture participants to
cooperate lawfully in setting prices for the joint venture. n43 Absent such
tracking of costs and cooperation in creating practice efficiencies,
physician-owned joint ventures risk violating the antitrust price fixing
prohibition when physicians set prices for the ventures collectively. n44 The
fact that physicians themselves are required to engage in a form of economic
credentialing demonstrates the pervasiveness of controlling healthcare costs in
today's largely managed care market.

   IV. The Appearance of "Competitive Credentialing"

 A more recent form of pure economic credentialing has even further  [*715]
polarized the debate. As stated above, hospitals performing pure economic
credentialing attempt to assess the fiscal impact upon the hospitals' grant of
staff privileges to physicians with particular practice patterns. n45
Competitive credentialing, whereby a hospital grants or denies privileges to a
physician based upon competitive criteria, is a narrower species of pure
economic credentialing. n46 For example, a hospital practicing competitive
credentialing may refuse to grant or renew staff privileges to any physicians
who have ownership interests in a competing ambulatory surgery center or
specialty hospital. n47

   Physicians contend that competitive credentialing is nothing less than a
blatant attempt to thwart competition by discouraging physicians from creating
competing ventures. n48 Physicians argue that these ventures have the potential
to draw patients away from hospitals due to the better patient-service quality
and lower rates of the ventures, n49 benefits to which healthcare consumers are
entitled.

   Hospitals counter with what they believe are valid business justifications
for competitive credentialing. The two most often cited justifications are that
competitive credentialing is necessary for the hospital (1) to combat "economic
dumping" and (2) to protect against conflicts of interest. Economic dumping
occurs when physicians who have ownership interests in competing facilities
retain the more profitable, i.e., less sick and less complex, cases for
themselves, and direct the sicker, more expensive cases to the hospital. n50
This disadvantages the hospital due to the fact that Medicare reimbursement n51
is paid pursuant to a  [*716]  diagnosis related group ("DRG") methodology,
whereby the reimbursement is, more or less, n52 a set dollar amount that
corresponds to a particular coded diagnosis. The reimbursement amount is derived
as an average reimbursement for all of the services that a patient with the
particular diagnosis is expected to receive from the hospital as treatment for
the particular condition. n53 But generally, the DRG payment is not adjusted
within a particular DRG value for differences in severity of the illness. n54
Therefore, sicker patients assigned to a particular DRG generate more cost and,
consequently, produce less profits for the hospital, because the reimbursement
is a set amount. Less sick patients assigned to the same DRG generate less cost
and consequently yield higher profit for the hospital. Over the entire
population of patients that fall within a particular DRG, the expectation is
that the reimbursement will even out and, ultimately, yield an average
acceptable margin of profit for an efficiently operated hospital. n55 Economic
dumping, however, disrupts the standard operation of this reimbursement
methodology. n56 If all of the less costly cases within a given DRG are skimmed
off and sent to a competing ambulatory service center ("ASC") or specialty
hospital, then the general hospital is left with only those cases that are the
most expensive within the DRG to treat, so that the hospital would earn little
or no profit, or even experience a loss, on those cases. Referring physicians
would have an incentive to engage in economic dumping when they have an
ownership interest in a competing facility, in order to maximize their profits
from the self-owned venture. n57

    [*717]  Hospitals also assert another competitive concern about granting
staff privileges to physicians who directly compete with the hospitals. Hospital
staff physicians are often privy to the hospitals' business plans, marketing
initiatives, protocol development, and practice patterns. n58 The hospitals
argue that this "inside information" gives the physicians' competing joint
venture a competitive advantage, as it allows the joint venture to target the
hospitals' weaknesses when the joint venture develops its own business plans and
marketing strategies. n59 Hospitals contend that it is contrary to sound
business sense to grant staff privileges to physicians who not only have no
loyalty to the hospital, but also, in fact, have the goal to draw patients away
from the hospital. n60

   V. A Legal Analysis of the Cases That Have Challenged Economic Credentialing

 After discussing the antitrust hurdles inherent in a Sherman Antitrust Act
claim in Part V.A, this Article will proceed to examine the three types of cases
wherein physicians have challenged economic credentialing:



   (1) Part V.B discusses challenges to hospitals' consideration of economic
factors related to quality (the quality of care cases);



(2) Part V.C looks at challenges to hospitals' consideration of economic factors
related to administrative or managerial concerns (the exclusive contracting and
closed staff cases); and



(3) Part V.D examines challenges to hospitals' consideration of economic factors
related to competition (the competitive credentialing cases).

 Parts V.B, V.C, and V.D will address the various types of legal claims that
have been raised in each of these categories of cases:



   (1) that the credentialing practices violated the antitrust laws,



(2) that the credentialing practices were inconsistent with the hospitals'
bylaws or other contract provisions between the physicians and hospitals, and



(3) that the credentialing practices offended public policy because the
practices were inconsistent with the hospital's public health goals.

 Ultimately, these cases show the extreme difficulties that physicians have
faced when challenging economic credentialing. Under the above-mentioned legal
theories that have been raised in cases to date, the plaintiff physicians were
successful only in very limited circumstances.

   A. The Antitrust Hurdles

 Under both sections 1 and 2 of the Sherman Anti-Trust Act, n61 the plaintiff
[*718]  physicians have encountered difficulties in proving the required
elements when they have challenged economic credentialing. Section 1 of Title 15
of the United States Code prohibits conspiracies in restraint of trade. Proving
a section 1 claim against a hospital's use of economic indicators in
credentialing has proven difficult for physicians due to four reasons.

   First, the conspiracy element requires the plaintiff to prove that the
hospital agreed with another entity to restrain trade. Because a hospital's
decision to deny staff privileges is usually an independent decision, there
often is no conspiracy, and a section 1 claim is foreclosed. n62 Even when
members of the medical staff make the decision collectively, as long as they do
not compete directly with the physician applying for privileges, the staff
members are typically deemed to be acting, collectively, as agents of the
hospital, and not as entities independent from the hospital. n63

   Second, in order to restrain trade, the defendant hospital must have market
power that will enable the hospital to harm the hospital services market by, for
example, successfully restricting consumer access, impairing patient-service
quality, or raising prices, without the defendant hospital is losing business.
n64 A hospital that denies staff privileges for economic reasons, but does not
have market power, will simply lose business, as the physicians and their
patients will relocate to other hospitals where the doctors have privileges, so
that the market itself will correct the abuse. n65 Therefore, market power of
the hospital is a prerequisite to any section 1 violation. The problem is that
such market power is difficult to prove when there are multiple hospitals
providing comparable services in a given geographical area. n66

   Third, as it is "trade" that must be restrained, a finding that a single
physician was damaged by a denial or termination of staff privileges from a
single hospital is usually insufficient. n67 The plaintiff physician must show
that the denial or termination of privileges impaired competition in the
healthcare market as a whole, i.e., restricted the availability of healthcare
choices, impaired patient-service quality, or raised prices for consumers.
Therefore, where a single physician is denied privileges, but there are other
hospitals in the region where  [*719]  the physician has or can obtain
privileges, trade is not restrained, because the physician's patients can simply
go to an alternate hospital to obtain services where the plaintiff physician can
attend to the patients. n68

   Fourth, the plaintiff physicians are typically unable to sustain a per se
finding of illegality in healthcare antitrust cases. n69 A practice is per se
illegal under the antitrust laws where the restraint is "manifestly
anticompetitive" and without redeeming pro-competitive qualities. n70 Most
healthcare antitrust claims are relegated to "rule of reason" treatment, where
the anticompetitive impacts of the hospital's practice are weighed against their
pro-competitive justifications. n71 Under the rule of reason, physicians are
usually unable to overcome the hospital's proffered justifications of quality of
care, efficiency, and economy, which are often deemed to outweigh the economic
harm to a single plaintiff physician. n72

   Similar antitrust hurdles exist under section 2 of the Sherman Anti-Trust
Act, which prohibits monopolization or attempts to monopolize. n73 As with
section 1, monopolization claims against a hospital require, as a threshold
matter, that the hospital possess monopoly (market) power and that the harm
alleged be to the overall market, not just to the individual plaintiff. n74
Without control of the market to enable the hospital to effectively reduce
consumer choices or raise prices, the hospital's allegedly unfair practices
merely would drive customers away and would not restrain trade in the overall
market.

   B. The Credentialing Cases Where Hospitals Considered Economic Factors That
Furthered Quality Goals

 The first foray by hospitals into economic credentialing was the hospitals' use
of economic factors that also related to quality ("hybrid criteria"). When
economic criteria have been linked to quality concerns, the cases have  [*720]
consistently held that hospitals have the authority to apply such criteria when
making credentialing decisions.

   Because of the difficulty in overcoming the above antitrust hurdles, most
physician plaintiffs failed to sustain a section 1 claim challenging hospitals'
use of hybrid economic criteria. n75 One example of such a failure is Friedman
v. Delaware County Memorial Hospital, n76 where the plaintiff, Dr. Friedman,
asserted, inter alia, Sherman section 1 claims against the hospital for revoking
his staff privileges following a detailed review of his practices at the
hospital. n77 The revocation followed charges by the hospital's Medical
Executive Committee that Dr. Friedman had inappropriately overutilized
bronchoscopies, had ordered inappropriate intravenous hyperalimentation, had
been disciplined repeatedly for delinquent record keeping, and had openly
announced that he would not follow hospital protocols for bronchoscopies in the
future. n78 The District Court ruled that there was no per se violation of
section 1, because the hospital had successfully established that the revocation
was justified by the hospital's goal of promoting quality patient care. n79
Under the rule of reason, the court held that the hospital's actions to increase
efficiency and maintain its competitive position with regard to quality were
pro-competitive, not anticompetitive. n80 The court declared that the hospital's
adoption of bronchoscopy criteria was for the protection of the hospital's
patients and to protect the hospital from the realistic threat of malpractice
claims. n81 Further, the court held that Dr. Friedman could not establish the
conspiracy element, because the physicians on the Medical Executive Committee
who recommended the revocation of Dr. Friedman's privileges did not compete with
Dr. Friedman and, thus, were acting as agents of the hospital, not separate
entities, when the committee made the credentialing decision. n82

   Dr. Friedman had no better success in proving his Sherman section 2
monopolization claim. In Friedman, there were seven hospitals in the immediate
vicinity of the defendant hospital and approximately thirty-five hospitals
within ten miles. n83 The plaintiff possessed staff privileges at one of these
alternate facilities, so that the revocation by the defendant hospital did not
completely  [*721]  foreclose Dr. Friedman's ability to continue to practice in
the region. n84 Under these facts, the court found, as a matter of law, that the
plaintiff could not establish that the defendant hospital had market power to
exclude competition. This foreclosed the section 2 claim. n85

   The plaintiff physicians have not met with much greater success with claims
that hospitals violated contractual provisions when the hospitals considered
economic criteria related to quality when denying or terminating staff
privileges. Courts have expressed extreme reluctance to review the substance of
hospitals' credentialing decisions related to quality and generally have limited
judicial review to whether the procedures used by the hospital violated the
express terms of the hospital's bylaws or other contractual arrangements. n86
Moreover, such contract claims are generally foreclosed to the plaintiff
physicians who do not already have staff privileges with the hospital. n87

   For example, Knapp v. Palos Community Hospital n88 demonstrates the narrow
basis for review on contractual grounds when a defendant hospital denies renewal
of staff privileges using economic criteria related to quality. In Knapp, the
defendant hospital denied the plaintiff physicians' applications for
reappointment after finding that the plaintiffs' inappropriate use of lung scans
and medications and their excessive use of diagnostic tests, pacemakers, and
pulmonary angiograms, as well as other issues of inappropriate care and
overutilization, had resulted in hospitalizations that were fifty percent longer
and costs that were thirty-one percent greater than those of other staff
physicians. n89 The court declared its "unwillingness to substitute its judgment
for that of private hospital authorities" making credentialing decisions, except
that the court would engage in "limited review" where the hospital violated its
own bylaws. n90 Because the defendant hospital had complied with the procedures
set forth in its bylaws, the court declared that the dispute was "beyond the
scope of  [*722]  judicial review" and held that the trial court had abused its
discretion in granting a preliminary injunction in favor of the plaintiffs. n91

   The case law, thus, demonstrates that when hospitals utilized hybrid economic
criteria to make credentialing determinations, the hospitals were generally
successful in defending against antitrust claims raised by the excluded
physicians. Further, as long as the hospitals did not violate their own
procedural bylaws, courts have been reluctant to review hospitals' refusals to
renew privileges where the hospitals were able to assert a nexus to quality
concerns.

   C. The Credentialing Cases Where Hospitals Considered Economic Factors
Related to Administrative Goals

 The cases dealing with credentialing restrictions or denials based upon a
hospital's administrative decision to operate in a more efficient manner, such
as decisions to close staff in a particular department or to enter into an
exclusive contract for specialty services, are the transition cases between
using hybrid criteria related to quality and engaging in competitive
credentialing. Where exclusive contract or closed staff decisions were linked to
quality, courts easily found that the hospitals were authorized to make those
decisions. But, for the first time, some of these cases involved decisions by
hospitals to enter into exclusive contracts or to close their staffs for purely
economic reasons. Nevertheless, as with the quality cases, courts have generally
upheld these decisions by hospitals, as long as the hospitals were able to prove
a legitimate business justification for their decisions. The only two potential
bases upon which to strike the hospitals' determinations that the courts have
articulated are (1) where the hospitals' actions were not reasonably related to
their stated efficiency goals and (2) where the hospitals breached procedural
requirements mandated by their medical staff bylaws or other contracts.

   As with the quality cases, courts found the same deficiencies with the
plaintiff physicians' claims under the federal antitrust laws, i.e., lack of
conspiracy, lack of harm to the overall healthcare market, rule of reason
balancing in favor of the hospital's legitimate business justifications, and
failure to prove the hospital's market power. Only in very narrow circumstances
have these antitrust claims been successful against the defendant hospitals.

   The landmark case, Jefferson Parish Hospital District No. 2 v. Hyde, n92
conclusively demonstrated the difficulties of proving antitrust claims against a
hospital that denied staff privileges based on the hospital's decision to enter
into  [*723]  an exclusive contract with a particular provider group for
specialty services. In Jefferson Parish, the plaintiff physician alleged Sherman
section 1 claims against the hospital when the hospital denied his application
for anesthesiology privileges on the ground that the hospital had an exclusive
contract with an anesthesiology group. n93 Reversing the Fifth Circuit's
judgment against the hospital, the United States Supreme Court found that the
hospital, one of at least twenty in the New Orleans metropolitan area and
servicing only about thirty percent of the patients living in Jefferson Parish,
did not have market power. n94 In addition, the Court held that there had been
no showing of injury to the market as a whole, as there was no evidence that the
exclusive contract had affected price, quality, or availability of
anesthesiology services. n95

   After Jefferson Parish was decided, plaintiff physicians generally were not
successful in their attempts to establish antitrust claims challenging
hospitals' decisions to enter into exclusive contracts or to close staffs due to
overcrowding. In Beard v. Parkview Hospital, n96 the Sixth Circuit Court of
Appeals held that the hospital's exclusive contract for radiological services
did not violate Sherman sections 1 and 2 because the plaintiff physician had
failed to rebut the hospital's legitimate business reasons for adopting the
exclusive contract. n97 The court declared that the contract was "necessary to
enhance the quality of care its patients receive as well as improve the
efficiency of the hospital." n98

   Courts have made findings similar to Jefferson Parish and Beard when
analyzing the legality of exclusive hospital contracts under state antitrust
laws. n99  [*724]  And, where a plaintiff physician group has challenged a
hospital's termination of the group's exclusive contract for specialty services
and the hospital's replacement with an exclusive contract with another group,
courts have generally held that there is no injury to the market overall,
because "merely changing exclusive contractors ... cannot constitute a violation
of the antitrust laws." n100

   Oltz v. Saint Peter's Community Hospital n101 is one of the few cases in
which a court found against a hospital on a Sherman section 1 claim, based upon
the hospital's entrance into an exclusive contract, here for anesthesiology
services. n102 Oltz is a unique case, however, because the defendant hospital
entered into the exclusive anesthesiology arrangement not for efficiency
reasons, but because an anesthesiology group providing services to the hospital
was threatening to boycott the hospital altogether unless the group was made the
exclusive provider, and exclusivity was sought with the express intent of
ousting the plaintiff, a competing nurse anesthetist who offered a fuller range
of services at a lower price. n103 Since two independent entities - the hospital
and the anesthesiology group - collaborated in adopting the exclusive
arrangement, the court was able to find the conspiracy element satisfied. n104
In addition, after the plaintiff's ouster from the hospital, the prices of
anesthesia services and the incomes of the exclusive anesthesiology group
members rose dramatically, n105 thereby demonstrating harm to the local market
for anesthesiology services. And, because the hospital was the only facility
equipped to perform general surgery in Helena, Montana, enjoying a market share
of eighty-four percent of general surgical services, n106 the hospital arguably
possessed market power for anesthesiology services. n107 Finally, because the
predominant reason for the exclusive arrangement was to foreclose competition
from the plaintiff, not a  [*725]  valid business reason, the rule of reason
balancing test weighed in favor of the plaintiff. n108 In sum, the unique facts
in Oltz overcame the antitrust hurdles discussed earlier, n109 making Oltz one
of the few cases where a hospital's exclusive contract was successfully
challenged on antitrust grounds.

   Plaintiff physicians asserting contract challenges n110 to hospitals'
decisions to enter into exclusive provider contracts or to close staffs have not
fared much better. Lister v. Methodist Medical Center of Oak Ridge n111
exemplifies the difficulties in succeeding with a contractual challenge where
there is anything less than a clear and unequivocal breach. In Lister, an
excluded anesthesiologist alleged that the hospital's termination of his
anesthesiology privileges by virtue of the hospital's entrance into an exclusive
anesthesiology arrangement violated the hospital's medical staff bylaws. The
hospital conceded that it had entered into the exclusive contract because the
contract was more economical for the hospital. The plaintiff contended that the
elimination of his ability to practice at the hospital conflicted with bylaw
provisions giving staff members the right to a hearing when the hospital
decreased their staff privileges for reasons of competence. n112 The appellate
court disagreed, finding that the termination of the plaintiff's privileges in
the interest of economy did not constitute a termination related to competence.
Therefore, the plaintiff's hearing rights under the bylaws had not been
triggered. n113

   The situation may be quite different where the bylaws give hearing rights to
physicians whose staff privileges are terminated or reduced for any reason. In
[*726]  Lewisburg Community Hospital, Inc. v. Alfredson, n114 the hospital's
bylaws afforded hearing rights to staff physicians whenever their staff
privileges were reduced. n115 Accordingly, the court held that the hospital's
termination of the defendant's exclusive radiology contract and the hospital's
refusal to give the defendant access to the hospital's radiological equipment
and staff constituted a reduction in privileges that triggered the hearing
rights. n116

   Courts examining closed staff or exclusive contract arrangements on public
policy grounds n117 also have generally upheld the hospitals' decisions where
they were undertaken to improve the hospital's finances. n118 Denying a
plaintiff physician's motion to enjoin a hospital from enforcing an exclusive
radiology contract, the District Court for the Northern District of Georgia in
Mays v. Hospital Authority of Henry County, n119 declared that where the
hospital's exclusive arrangement had decreased the hospital's losses for the
radiology department by nearly $ 230,000 over about two and a half years,
bringing the department "closer to solvency ... serves the public interest."
n120

   The companion New Jersey cases n121 of Desai v. Saint Barnabas Medical Center
n122 and Berman v. Valley Hospital n123 illustrate a pitfall for the defendant
hospitals that defend closed staff decisions on public policy grounds: when
hospitals state a public health goal underlying a closed staff policy, the
policy must be rationally related to accomplishing the stated public health
goals. n124 In Desai, the hospital adopted a closed staff policy in response to
bed overcrowding and overutilization of the hospital's resources. Under the new
policy, applications for staff privileges would be denied, unless the applicant
satisfied one or more of six exceptions. The most important exception was that
the applicant had to be associated with another physician who already had staff
privileges at the hospital. n125 While the court recognized the right of the
hospital  [*727]  to "take some steps" in reasonable response to the perceived
overcrowding, n126 the court struck the hospital's preference for doctors who
practiced with doctors already on staff. The court held that the hospital had
not sufficiently demonstrated that the preference genuinely served the
hospital's stated objectives - that the affiliated staff members would be able
to help cover the patients of the doctors with existing privileges and that the
new staff members were unlikely to require many new patient admissions to the
hospital. n127 The court struck the preference as discriminatory because the
hospital offered no data or other competent evidence to support its rationale
and because the preference did not advance the pubic health goal asserted. n128

   In Berman, the hospital similarly adopted a closed staff policy in response
to overcrowding but granted an exception for newcomers to the region. Here, as
in Desai, the court recognized the hospital's right to implement staff
restrictions to remedy overcrowding. n129 But the court held that the exception
for doctors who had been practicing in the area for less than two years failed
to advance the hospital's stated objectives. n130 The hospital had asserted that
the exception would address overcrowding by eliminating doctors with established
patient bases, while allowing the admission of new doctors who possessed
knowledge of the latest techniques. n131 As in Desai, the court found that the
newcomer exception lacked any empirical support; the exception excluded
experienced doctors who might have small patient bases and admitted newcomer
doctors who might have no knowledge of new techniques. n132 Because the hospital
had failed to show that the exception was "sufficiently related to a genuine and
legitimate health-care objective," the court held that the exception was
unenforceable. n133

   Thus, the cases upholding a hospital's decision to close staff or enter into
an exclusive arrangement far outnumber those cases reversing such decisions.
Under the antitrust laws, the plaintiff has the greatest chance of success on a
Sherman section 2 claim, where the conspiracy element is not required. But to
establish monopoly, the plaintiff faces the twin hurdles of proving that the
hospital has market power and demonstrating a detrimental impact to the overall
market, not just to the excluded physicians.

    [*728]  Outside of the antitrust realm, courts appear to have struck
exclusive arrangements for only two reasons: (1) the hospital failed to follow
its own bylaws in implementing the restriction, or (2) the exclusive
arrangements did not effectuate the goals asserted by the hospital and, thus,
were irrational on public policy grounds. Indeed, the cases striking the
hospitals' credentialing decisions serve only to demonstrate how easy it is for
a hospital to withstand challenge on contractual or public policy grounds. Where
a hospital establishes a legitimate economic or efficiency rationale for its
exclusionary conduct, and where it follows its own internal procedural rules,
economic credentialing for administrative reasons largely is upheld by courts.

   D. The Credentialing Cases Where Hospitals Considered Economic Factors
Related to Competition

 A relatively recent development in economic credentialing is the denial or
termination of physicians' staff privileges by hospitals in order to achieve
competitive goals. Typically, hospitals have engaged in competitive
credentialing by promulgation, through the hospitals' boards of trustees, of a
"conflict of interest policy" that bars staff privileges to physicians who have
investment interests in competing institutions. n134 Cases challenging such
competitive credentialing have met many of the same difficulties as those cases
where the credentialing decisions were based on economic criteria related to
administrative needs. In the antitrust context, plaintiff physicians have
encountered difficulties in proving the elements of conspiracy, market power,
and injury to competition. n135 In antitrust cases in which the hospital
replaced one exclusive specialty provider with another because the original
provider had entered into direct competition with the hospital, plaintiffs have
typically met with no success, because the courts have found that the mere
substitution of exclusive providers has "no detrimental effect on competition."
n136 In challenges  [*729]  to competitive credentialing alleging breach of
bylaws or arbitrary action, the courts generally have upheld the authority of
hospital boards to make decisions relating to competition and have affirmed the
hospitals' consideration of competitive factors as rational n137 and valid. n138
Not only have most courts ruled against plaintiffs' claims, but several courts
have affirmatively declared that it is perfectly legitimate for a hospital to
decide not to affiliate with physicians who are directly competing with the
hospital.

   In the antitrust context, the court in Williamson v. Sacred Heart Hospital of
Pensacola n139 denied Sherman section 1 claims asserted by the plaintiffs, a
physician and her solely owned outpatient radiology clinic, against two
hospitals that had denied the physician's staff privileges on the grounds that
her clinic competed directly with the hospitals. Not only did the court find
that the plaintiffs had failed to establish the hospitals' market power, n140
but the court also found that the plaintiffs' claims failed to recognize the
realities of competition:



   In light of [the] plaintiff's position in the market, granting her any type
of privileges while she still operated her own clinic would put Sacred Heart in
the position of supporting its main competition. Essentially, Sacred Heart would
be competing with itself. Faced with this possibility, it clearly had a
rational, pro-competitive reason for acting independently to deny [the plaintiff
physician's] request for privileges. n141

 Based on its finding that the hospitals had acted to protect their "legitimate
economic interests," the court awarded summary judgment to the defendants. n142

   In one of the most recent antitrust competitive credentialing cases, Surgical
Care Center of Hammond v. Hospital Service District No. 1 of Tangipahoa Parish,
n143 the Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit affirmed the district court's
denial of the plaintiff's Sherman section 1 and 2 claims against the hospital
for responding to the establishment of the plaintiff's competing ambulatory
surgery center by entering into exclusive outpatient contracts with managed care
[*730]  companies. n144 The appellate court affirmed that the antitrust claims
were foreclosed by the plaintiff's failure to prove market power of the
hospital. n145 Further, the court declared that the "predatory conduct" alleged
by the plaintiff was more appropriately characterized as having "a permissible
business justification." n146

   Potters Medical Center v. The City Hospital Ass'n n147 is the rare case where
competitive credentialing by a hospital was deemed potentially violative of the
antitrust law. n148 As such, Potters provides useful instruction on the unusual
set of market conditions that must coalesce in order for a court to rule in the
plaintiff's favor on antitrust claims. Potters involved federal and state
antitrust claims brought by a 39-bed hospital and its affiliated corporations
against a much larger 275-bed hospital, the only other hospital in East
Liverpool, Ohio. n149 The plaintiffs alleged that in an attempt to crush their
ability to compete for inpatient, outpatient pathology, and diagnostic imaging
services, the defendant hospital, inter alia, refused to grant staff privileges
to doctors with privileges at the plaintiff hospital, pressured the hospital's
affiliated doctors not to seek staff privileges with the plaintiff hospital, and
entered into restrictive contracts with the hospital's staff physicians to
prohibit the staff physicians' dealings with the plaintiffs. n150 While the
Sixth Circuit Court of Appeals denied the Sherman section 1 claims due to lack
of the conspiracy element, n151 it reversed summary judgment to the defendant
hospital on the section 2 monopolization claims, finding that the district court
had failed to identify the relevant markets or determine whether the hospital
had market power n152 and that facts alleged by the plaintiffs demonstrated a
conceivable intent to foreclose competition. n153 Accordingly, the court
remanded, for a determination by the district court of whether City Hospital was
a monopolist in certain markets, as alleged by the plaintiffs. n154

    [*731]  A decision denying in part the defendant hospital's motion to
dismiss antitrust claims in the pending case of Rome Ambulatory Surgical Center,
LLC v. Rome Memorial Hospital, Inc., n155 is the only current positive judicial
sign for plaintiff physicians seeking to raise antitrust claims against
hospitals engaging in competitive credentialing. The plaintiff surgery center
("RASC") contends that it was forced out of business through a pattern of
anticompetitive behavior by the defendant hospital, the only other provider of
ambulatory surgery in the city of Rome, New York. n156 RASC alleges that it was
shut out as a referral source when the hospital entered into exclusive
ambulatory surgery contracts with area health plans. n157 Also, the hospital
allegedly harassed staff surgeons who used RASC facilities n158 and amended its
bylaws to allow consideration of physicians' ownership interest in competing
facilities when it considers applications for staff privileges. n159 While the
court granted defendants' motions for summary judgment on some of the antitrust
claims, n160 it refused to dismiss plaintiff's claims for illegal contracts
brought under Sherman section 1, and for attempted monopolization and conspiracy
to monopolize brought under Sherman section 2. n161

   In the non-antitrust context, courts also have affirmatively declared the
validity of competitive credentialing. The most widely cited case for this
[*732]  proposition is Rosenblum v. Tallahassee Memorial Regional Medical
Center, Inc. n162 Dr. Rosenblum sued the hospital when it denied him cardiac
surgical privileges because he was the developer and chairman of the heart
surgery program at a competing hospital. n163 The court granted summary judgment
to the hospital on two grounds. First, the court held that consideration of Dr.
Rosenblum's ostensible conflict of interest was permitted by chapter 395.011(5)
of the Florida Statutes, n164 which allows hospitals to establish criteria for
staff privileges, including training and medical qualifications and "such other
elements as may be determined by the governing board." n165 The court found that
the economic criteria utilized in Dr. Rosenblum's case constituted valid "other
elements" that the hospital could take into account. n166

   Second, the Rosenblum court determined that the hospital's economic criteria
had not been applied to Dr. Rosenblum in an arbitrary or capricious manner. The
court declared:



   In the area of fair and clean competition, Dr. Rosenblum has contractual
responsibilities to TCH [the competing hospital] that I think are validly [sic]
considerations of TMRMC [the defendant hospital] as to whether they will grant
medical privileges in the field of heart surgery to the program chairman and
developer of a competing hospital. And the competition between hospitals, not
only in Tallahassee but apparently on a national scale, is intense. It is real.
It is not imaginary and not pretextual.



 Accordingly, I find the Hospital not to be liable. I find it validly denied Dr.
Rosenblum medical privileges on factors and considerations that were
economically valid ... . n167

 While the case ultimately settled pretrial, when the defendant hospital
extended privileges to Dr. Rosenblum once his competing contract expired, the
case is noteworthy in its open declaration that competition is a valid
consideration in determining staff privileges. n168

    [*733]  In Mahan v. Avera Saint Luke's, n169 the court upheld competitive
credentialing against breach of contract claims. n170 In Mahan, the defendant
hospital closed its staff to physicians performing particular types of spinal
surgeries in order to assure that there were sufficient patients for its newly
recruited neurosurgeon, who needed to supplement his practice by performing
spinal surgeries. n171 The closure was also precipitated by the hospital's loss
of surgery business due to the creation of a competing orthopedic surgery
outpatient center. n172 A physician group challenged the closure on the grounds
that the closure breached the hospital's staff bylaws which, the plaintiffs
argued, required the hospital to consult with the medical staff on closure
decisions. n173 In ruling that the hospital's action did not violate its bylaws,
the Mahan Court found that the hospital's Board had the unilateral authority to
make business decisions, as opposed to decisions evaluating the professional
competence of staff members, which under the bylaws required consultation with
staff. n174

    [*734]  Further, the court declared that there was little basis on which to
challenge decisions that the hospital had made to preserve its economic
viability:



   By preserving the profitable neurosurgical services at ASL [the hospital],
the Board also insured that other unprofitable services would continue to be
offered in the Aberdeen area... . ASL cannot continue to offer unprofitable, yet
essential services including the maternity ward, emergency room, pediatrics and
critical care units, without the offsetting financial benefit of more profitable
areas such as neurosurgery. The Board responded to the effect the OSS hospital
[competing surgery center] would have on the economic viability of ASL's
hospital and the health care needs of the entire Aberdeen community. These
actions were within the power of the Board. It surely has the power to attempt
to insure ASL's economic survival. n175



 ... .



 ... How can a doctor who is a part owner of the for-profit OSS be expected to
fulfill his or her duties towards his or her co-owners and in the same instance
fulfill the duties towards the principal, ASL, who is a not for profit hospital?
This does not imply ill-will on the part of the doctor, it simply faces
fundamental medical issues such as at which institution does the doctor place
his or her patients, OSS or ASL? We have often stated that an agent cannot serve
two masters. This rule applies to medical professionals as well. n176

 In the above competitive credentialing cases, admittedly only a few, illustrate
that the balance appears to be tipping decidedly in favor of the hospitals. n177
Moreover, no case has gone so far as to find, or even to suggest, that  [*735]
hospitals do not have the right to consider competitive issues when they make
credentialing decisions.

   However, the cases also demonstrate the importance of a hospital's avoidance
of procedural challenges by examining the hospital's medical staff bylaws prior
to adopting a conflict of interest policy to determine whether the bylaws
require medical staff approval of the policy or require hearing rights when the
policy is applied. If the bylaws require medical staff approval before staff
privileges can be terminated or substantially reduced for any reason, then a
conflict of interest policy presumably could not be applied without involvement
of medical staff. n178 In contrast, medical staff bylaws would not interfere
with adoption or application of a conflict of interest policy if the bylaws
clearly apply only to credentialing decisions based on quality of care or
professionalism. n179

   E. New Cases Challenging Competitive Credentialing

 Three new case filings have brought the issue of competitive credentialing to
center stage. In each case, the plaintiff physicians challenge a conflict of
interest policy, adopted by one or more hospitals, which resulted in termination
of the plaintiffs' practice privileges due to the plaintiffs' ownership interest
in a competing facility.

   In the first filing, on February 24, 2004, in Arkansas state court, six
cardiologists in Murphy v. Baptist Health n180 challenged a conflict of interest
policy implemented by the defendant, Baptist Health, a non-profit corporation
providing medical care through hospitals and clinics throughout the state. n181
The plaintiffs were principals in a cardiology clinic that owns a substantial
interest in  [*736]  Arkansas Heart Hospital, which specializes in treatment of
heart disease. n182 The conflict of interest policy challenged in Murphy
mandates denial of initial or renewed staff privileges to any practitioner who
acquires an ownership or investment interest in a competing hospital. n183 The
plaintiffs alleged that because Baptist Health is the preferred hospital
provider for Arkansas Blue Cross Blue Shield in central Arkansas, the state's
largest provider of health coverage, Baptist Health's termination of the
physician plaintiffs' privileges deprives many patients of the cardiac
physicians of the patients' choice. n184 The plaintiffs asserted claims based on
state anti-kickback law, state false claims law, state deceptive trade practices
law, and common law tortious interference with doctor/patient relationships.
n185

   By a March 22nd order, the Murphy court granted a preliminary injunction to
the plaintiffs, enjoining Baptist Health from terminating the plaintiffs' staff
privileges via application of its conflict of interest policy. n186 The court
declared that the primary reason for the injunction was to prevent irreparable
harm to the plaintiffs' patients, whose insurance plans required treatment at
Baptist Health. n187 The court declared that the potential "fracture of the
doctor-patient relationship is paramount, and, therefore, the equities and
public policy weigh in favor of the doctors." n188 No trial date has yet been
scheduled. n189 The case has been reported as "being closely watched for
possible precedent." n190

   Counterbalancing the injunction issued in Murphy is the recent denial of a
temporary restraining order against the defendant hospitals in Berasi v. Ohio
Health Corp., n191 a competitive credentialing case filed in Ohio state court on
March 2, 2004. n192 Dr. Berasi and eight other physicians sued three affiliated
hospitals when the hospitals terminated the plaintiffs' staff privileges on the
basis that the plaintiffs were founding investors of a competing specialty
hospital. n193  [*737]  The plaintiffs contended, inter alia, that the
hospitals' new conflict of interest policy violated the plaintiffs' rights to
due process, breached the medical staff bylaws, and had been applied in an
arbitrary and unreasonable manner. n194 The conflict of interest policy provides
that staff members with ownership interests in competing hospitals are deemed to
have voluntarily withdrawn or terminated their staff privileges with the
defendant hospitals. n195 While the hospitals implemented "fair hearing"
procedures for such terminations, the procedures limit a physician's evidence to
showing that the policy has been "incorrectly applied to the Practitioner based
upon inaccurate facts." n196 Shortly after the judge denied the plaintiffs'
application for a temporary restraining order to reinstate their privileges
during the pendency of the litigation, the plaintiffs withdrew their action,
n197 reportedly to "weigh their options." n198

   Finally, a third competitive credentialing case, Biddulph v. HCA Inc., n199
was filed in Idaho state court on March 3, 2004. In Biddulph, five physicians
are suing the Eastern Idaho Regional Medical Center for terminating their
practice privileges due to the physicians' ownership interest in a competing
specialty hospital. n200 The Board for the medical center unilaterally
promulgated and applied a "Medical Staff Development Plan ... and Policy," which
authorizes the Board to consider competitive concerns in physician credentialing
decisions. n201 The Board is alleged to have applied three criteria against the
plaintiffs that resulted in the plaintiffs' ouster: whether they had an
investment interest in a competing facility; whether the number of the
physicians' inpatient admissions to the medical center had decreased by twenty
percent from the prior year; and whether the percentage of the physicians'
Medicare or Medicaid inpatient admissions to the medical center had increased by
ten percent from the prior year. n202 The plaintiffs have charged the medical
center with breaching its medical staff bylaws and restraint of trade and
monopolization under the state's antitrust laws. n203 The plaintiffs sought
injunctive relief, but the defendant hospitals rendered the injunctive issue
unripe by voluntarily deferring the effective date of the plaintiffs'
terminations until June 30, 2004. n204

    [*738]  Each of the two cases still pending, Murphy and Biddulph, raises
issues which hold the promise of making new law regarding circumstances under
which hospitals may or may not promulgate and apply conflict of interest
policies. The Murphy case raises substantial policy questions concerning
patients' rights and the impact that managed care arrangements with hospitals
will have on the legal analysis of such hospital policies. By granting the
plaintiffs' motion for preliminary injunction on the basis of preventing
irreparable harm to the doctor-patient relationship, the Murphy court has
demonstrated at least an initial partiality for the patient rights issue.

   The claims made in the Biddulph case, in contrast, raise issues of the due
process rights applicable to staff physicians terminated due to competitive
credentialing. Central questions in this case likely will be whether application
of the conflict of interest policy to staff physicians is permissible under the
medical staff bylaws and whether the hospital's criteria to detect patient
dumping reasonably affect the hospital's goal. The outcome in the Biddulph case
hopefully will provide guidance on the interplay between medical staff bylaws
and conflict of interest policies, and how hospitals can lawfully identify and
terminate privileges of physicians who engage in economic dumping.

   VI. State Laws on Economic Credentialing

 While several states have adopted laws restricting a hospital's ability to
consider economic factors in making credentialing decisions, n205 it is
significant  [*739]  that none of these statutes prohibit outright consideration
of economic criteria. The most prevalent forms of these laws prohibit hospitals
from restricting physicians' freedom to maintain staff privileges at other
hospitals n206 or from restricting patient referrals to other hospitals. n207
Moreover, most states that have passed laws dealing with economic credentialing
sanction the practice. n208

   Section 2801-b of the New York Public Health Law is a prime example of such a
statute that endorses economic credentialing. Section 2801-b, in pertinent part,
declares that:



   It shall be an improper practice for the governing body of a hospital to
refuse to act upon an application for staff membership or professional
privileges or to deny or withhold from a physician, podiatrist, optometrist or
dentist staff membership or professional privileges in a  [*740]  hospital, or
to exclude or expel a physician, podiatrist, optometrist or dentist from staff
membership in a hospital or curtail, terminate or diminish in any way a
physician's podiatrist's optometrist's or dentist's professional privileges in a
hospital, without stating the reasons therefore, or if the reasons stated are
unrelated to standards of patient care, patient welfare, the objectives of the
institution or the character or competency of the applicant. n209

 The application of section 2801-b of the New York Public Health Law by the New
York courts demonstrates how that statute, rather than serving as a restriction
on competitive credentialing, instead serves to legitimize the practice. In
Jackaway v. Northern Dutchess Hospital, n210 the plaintiff physician challenged
the defendant hospital's decision to transfer him from "active" staff to
"courtesy" staff, n211 alleging that this curtailment of the physician's
privileges violated section 2801-b. n212 The plaintiff's change in status was
mandated by the hospital's rule that granted appointments to "active" staff only
to physicians who had admitted at least twenty-five patients to the hospital
during the prior calendar year. n213 The rule had been adopted by the hospital
on the reasoning that medical policy decisions, permitted only for active staff
members, should be made by physicians who admitted "patients to the hospital on
a regular, rather than occasional, basis." n214 Applying section 2801-b to the
challenged decision, the court explained that the law had been promulgated to
"soften" the "harsh rule" allowing hospitals "unfettered discretion" in making
staff decisions. n215 Nevertheless, the court dismissed the complaint, holding
that because the hospital's asserted reasons for the denial were "authentic and
not pretenses," n216 the reasons ostensibly were related to the objectives of
the hospital, so that the requirements of section 2801-b were fulfilled. n217

    [*741]  Thus, even physicians in states that have enacted laws to restrict
hospitals' use of economic credentialing criteria cannot rely on the statutes as
a basis to reverse the credentialing decisions if the hospitals have not
violated the letter of the law. At best, physicians in the most restrictive
states, like California and Colorado, can utilize their statutes to prohibit
hospitals from engaging in the more aggressive forms of economic credentialing:
exclusive credentialing requirements that prohibit staff privileges elsewhere or
express referral mandates.

   VII. Recent GAO Reports on Specialty Hospitals

 Adding weight to physicians' burdens in challenging economic credentialing are
recent reports by the United States General Accounting Office ("GAO") on the
topic of "specialty hospitals." Specialty hospitals are hospitals that limit
their services to a relatively narrow band of inpatient and outpatient
procedures n218 and that are often owned, at least in part, by physicians. n219
Physicians have championed their rights to establish and refer the physicians'
own patients to specialty hospitals, emphasizing specialty hospitals' allegedly
improved quality, efficiency, and scheduling over general acute care hospitals.
n220 General hospitals counter that the specialty hospitals draw out of the
general hospitals the most profitable cases, n221 thereby impairing the ability
of the general hospitals to  [*742]  subsidize other, less profitable
departments, such as pediatrics and emergency services, which are nevertheless
critically important to the community. n222

   It was likely this sharp divide in opinion that influenced Congress n223 to
request the GAO to gather information on specialty hospitals. The GAO's April
18, 2003 report found that while specialty hospitals still constitute only a
small percentage of all hospitals, their number is growing. n224 The GAO also
reported that patients at specialty hospitals tended to be less sick than
patients with the same diagnoses at general hospitals. n225 This finding tends
to support the general hospitals' allegation that specialty hospitals are
"cherry-picking" the most lucrative cases.

   The GAO's follow-up October 22, 2003 Report n226 offers further support for
the general hospitals' position. This Report states that specialty hospitals
were less likely:



   (1) to have emergency departments, n227 significant because the Emergency
Medical Treatment and Active Labor Act ("EMTALA") n228 imposes costly staffing
and treatment requirements on emergency departments of hospitals; n229



(2) treated smaller percentages of Medicaid patients, n230 significant because
reimbursements for Medicaid cases tend to be the lowest  [*743]  program
reimbursements under the DRG system; and



(3) treated fewer inpatients proportionally, n231 relevant because outpatient
procedures, which do not require an overnight stay, tend to generate more
profit.

 Significantly, the Report confirms that specialty hospitals appear to
outperform general hospitals financially, when costs from all lines of business
and revenues from all payers are considered. n232 Once again, these GAO findings
buttress the general hospitals' allegations that specialty hospitals may be
"cherry-picking" the most profitable DRGs, and the most profitable cases within
those DRGs, to the detriment of general hospitals that have a community
commitment to provide less profitable forms of care that, nevertheless, are
necessary to the health of a community.

   The GAO Reports, therefore, are useful tools for hospitals to justify
credentialing criteria that include consideration of a physician's ownership
interest in a competing entity because the reports add legitimacy to the
business concerns that hospitals have articulated. n233 When added to courts'
declarations that competition is a valid credentialing consideration and that
conflicts of interest may be evaluated, n234 the support for competitive
credentialing is  [*744]  building.

   VIII. The New Challenge to Competitive Credentialing: That It Violates the
Fraud and Abuse Laws

 The most recent legal challenge to competitive credentialing clearly breaks
from the more traditional antitrust, contract, and public policy claims and
suggests that at least certain types of economic credentialing may violate
federal fraud and abuse laws, including the Anti-Kickback Law, n235 the Stark
Law, n236 and the False Claims Act. n237 This part of the article will explain
the theory behind this relatively new challenge to competitive credentialing and
will examine whether certain types of competitive credentialing can be deemed to
violate the fraud and abuse laws.

   A. The OIG Questions Whether Competitive Credentialing Constitutes a Kickback


 The federal anti-kickback provisions prohibit the knowing payment or receipt of
remuneration, in cash or in kind, in return for referring patients for services
paid for in whole or in part by federal healthcare programs. n238 The purpose
behind the law is twofold: first, to preclude providers from attempting to
recapture kickbacks that providers pay for patient referrals by performing extra
treatments that are not medically necessary or by raising their prices for
necessary treatments, which will inflate costs throughout the healthcare
delivery system, n239 and second, to avoid economic motives from interfering
with medical judgment when physicians make patient referrals. n240 Violators of
the anti-kickback law are guilty of a felony and can be fined up to $ 25,000 per
offense, or imprisoned up to five years, or both. n241 The Department of Health
and Human Services Office of Inspector General ("OIG") also may impose civil
money penalties n242 and exclude the violators from participating in federal
healthcare  [*745]  programs. n243 Courts have applied the statute very broadly,
where any purpose of the payment is to induce referrals. n244 In order to
protect commercial healthcare transactions that are deemed to pose little risk
of encouraging overutilization or unlawfully inflating healthcare payments, the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services ("CMS") n245 promulgated a series of
regulations describing "safe harbors," business practices that will not be
treated as criminal offenses or result in administrative penalties. n246
Applying the statute and regulations together, a practice may violate the
anti-kickback law if one purpose of reimbursement paid or received is to induce
referrals, and if the practice does not fall within a safe harbor.

   On December 9, 2002, the OIG, at the urging of the American Medical
Association ("AMA"), published in the Federal Register n247 a solicitation of
public comments to the following questions regarding the possible link between
certain competitive credentialing practices and the anti-kickback law: n248



   A. Are hospital staff privileges "remuneration"? ... Under what circumstances
do staff privileges have monetary value? n249



B. What are the implications of a hospital's denial of privileges to a physician
who competes with the hospital? ... How should such physicians be defined:
ownership? employee or contractor? staff leadership position?



 ...



D. Can privileges ever be conditioned on referrals, other than minimums
necessary for clinical proficiency? ... Guaranteeing a patient volume sufficient
to support offering a critical service not otherwise available ... ? n250

  [*746]  The OIG utilized the notice to indicate that it considered certain
competitive credentialing practices to be at either low risk or high risk of
violating the anti-kickback law. In the low risk category, the OIG referred to
only one practice: that the OIG does not believe that an across-the-board
hospital policy of refusing privileges to physicians with "significant conflicts
of interest" violates the anti-kickback law "in most situations." n251 The OIG
did not indicate situations where such categorical policies might be
problematic.

   In the "suspect" or high risk category, the OIG pointed to several
credentialing practices. The OIG indicated concerns over any hospital policies
that give the hospital discretion to evaluate a physician's conflict of interest
and to permit privileges subject to periodic reviews, as opposed to categorical
policies that flatly prohibit privileges once conflicts are identified. n252 The
OIG indicated that it suspects that under such discretionary arrangements, the
hospitals will allow physicians to retain privileges only when the physicians
make a sufficient volume or value of referrals to the hospitals. n253 In
addition, the OIG declared, assuming that privileges constitute remuneration,
that policies whereby hospitals condition privileges upon a physician's referral
of a specific level of referrals are "suspect." n254 Commentators, as well, have
suggested that a hospital's conditioning of staff privileges upon the hospital's
receipt of all or a given level of a physician's referrals violates the
anti-kickback law. n255

   Although the OIG's notice referred only to the anti-kickback law, the
potential exposure for hospitals that violate the anti-kickback law through the
hospitals' competitive credentialing policies is broader. Some courts have held
that, when remuneration is paid for referrals, the claims submitted to federal
healthcare programs for those referrals might be false for purposes of the False
Claims Act. n256 Moreover, if privileges are deemed to constitute remuneration
[*747]  for anti-kickback purposes, then a physician's referral of patients to
hospitals where the physician has privileges could also violate the Stark Law,
n257 which generally prohibits physicians from making referrals for designated
services payable by Medicare to entities with which the physicians have a
financial relationship. n258

   Testing this new fraud and abuse theory, the six cardiologist plaintiffs in
Murphy v. Baptist Health n259 allege that the conflict of interest policy
implemented by the defendant hospitals violates the federal anti-kickback law.
n260 The case initially was filed in federal district court n261 but dismissed
on the basis that there is no private right of action under the federal
anti-kickback law, so that there was no basis for federal jurisdiction. n262 The
plaintiffs immediately refiled in state court, again asserting the federal
anti-kickback claim, but only as a basis for seeking an injunction against
Baptist Health's application of its conflict of interest policy to the
plaintiffs. n263 While the Murphy court has granted a preliminary injunction to
the plaintiffs enjoining Baptist Health from terminating the plaintiffs' staff
privileges through application of its conflict of interest policy, n264 the
court did not rely on the plaintiffs' fraud and abuse  [*748]  argument as a
basis for the injunction. n265 However, the anti-kickback law is still at issue,
as the plaintiffs raise essentially similar claims under the Arkansas Fraud Act
and the Arkansas Medicaid Fraud False Claims Act. n266

   Although the substantive Murphy claims have not yet been heard in the state
court, dismissal of the case in the federal forum illustrates a drawback of
potential application of the federal anti-kickback law to hospital credentialing
practices. The injured parties, the excluded physicians, cannot themselves bring
such a claim. n267 Thus, the only way that excluded physicians could utilize the
federal anti-kickback law to force hospitals to abandon conflict of interest
policies is to convince the federal enforcement agencies to pursue the offending
hospitals. This may well prove to be a less than satisfactory tool for
physicians, because the enforcement agencies may be unable to act immediately on
every complaint that the agencies receive, and time is of the essence for the
excluded physicians to prevent any break in their credentialing status. n268
However, anti-kickback theories may be pursued by the plaintiffs under state
law, to the extent that such state laws confer private rights of action. n269

   B. Determining Whether Competitive Credentialing is a Kickback

 It is well established that a hospital's payment of money outright to
physicians for referrals or requirement of physicians to pay, via money or
services, the hospital as a condition of receiving referrals (through an
exclusive specialty services contract or otherwise) violates the anti-kickback
law. n270 A hospital lawfully may accept payments from exclusive providers for
services furnished to the providers by the hospital, but when such payments are
not tied to discrete services that the hospital is performing for the
physicians, or when the payments exceed fair market value for the services, then
the anti-kickback law is implicated. Where payments are made for referral
business, the fraud  [*749]  enforcement agencies theorize that the payer is
incentivized to recapture the payments by raising prices for healthcare services
or by performing additional services that are not medically necessary, key fraud
concerns. n271

   But in the typical case of competitive credentialing, where staff privileges
may be conferred or denied based upon whether the applicant competes with the
hospital or agrees to send all of his or her referrals, or a certain volume of
referrals, to the hospital, there is no express payment of money or goods by the
hospital to the applicant. Therefore, a threshold hurdle to overcome in order to
establish that competitive credentialing may violate the anti-kickback law is to
demonstrate that the grant of staff privileges by a hospital constitutes the
requisite "remuneration." If staff privileges are not deemed to be remuneration,
then there is no way that granting staff privileges for competitive reasons
could constitute the payment of remuneration, a necessary element of an
anti-kickback violation.

   Broadly characterizing staff privileges as remuneration has numerous
difficulties. Historically the OIG has taken the position that the grant of
staff privileges does not always constitute remuneration. The OIG's Management
Advisory Report "Financial Arrangements Between Hospitals and Hospital-Based
Physicians" announced that staff arrangements potentially violate the fraud and
abuse laws only where the hospital requires physicians to make payments to the
hospital in return for hospital business or charges physicians more than fair
market value for services furnished by the hospital. n272 This Report thereby
implies that the OIG's position is that the mere grant of staff privileges,
unaccompanied by such improper payments or charges, does not incur anti-kickback
risk. n273 Also, because hospitals lose referrals when the hospitals  [*750]
deny staff privileges to physicians, such denials would appear to contraindicate
fraud exposure, which typically occurs when hospitals induce referrals by paying
remuneration. n274 Finally, if the grant of staff privileges were deemed to be
remuneration in all cases, and assuming that at least one, not incidental,
purpose of a hospital's grant of staff privileges is to induce referrals, then
all grants of staff privileges would violate the anti-kickback law, n275 because
they would all constitute the payment of remuneration to induce referrals. n276
This is clearly inconsistent with past practices because the OIG has never
enforced the anti-kickback law against hospitals for the mere act of
credentialing physicians, and CMS has never seen fit to promulgate an
anti-kickback safe harbor for credentialing. n277

   Thus, the question is narrowed to whether the grant of staff privileges can
constitute remuneration in some cases but not in others. The OIG suggested, in
its recent solicitation for comments, that only certain staff privilege policies
potentially create fraud risk, i.e., only when hospitals condition the grant or
retention of staff privileges on a sufficient flow of referred business. n278
Deeming the grant of staff privileges to constitute remuneration only in these
cases can be justified for the reason that the hospital is treating the grant of
privileges as  [*751]  remuneration. It can be argued that privileges are being
used as a "trade-off" for referrals, which ostensibly imbues the privileges with
remunerative value. n279 Moreover, such a trade of privileges for referrals
raises key fraud concerns. Referrals might be made by physicians based not on
the physicians' medical judgment of the most appropriate hospital to treat
particular patients, but upon referral mandates imposed by the hospital. Such
referral mandates could result in referrals being made to hospitals that have
not achieved competitive levels of quality or efficiency, thereby interfering
with sound and independent medical judgment and impairing free market
competition based on quality and cost. n280 Conversely, staff privileges would
not constitute remuneration when they are inchoate, that is, when the privileges
confer upon a physician the mere ability (but not the requirement) to admit
patients, and will not necessarily result in any patient admissions. n281

    [*752]  Acceptance of the position suggested by the OIG's solicitation of
comments - that only those grants of staff privileges that are conditioned upon
referrals constitute remuneration and potentially violate the anti-kickback law
- leads to the following conclusions. First, there would appear to be only a
relatively narrow band of high-risk, competitive credentialing practices:
conditioning staff privileges upon receiving a given volume or value of
referrals. Conversely, any forms of competitive credentialing that do not
require referrals in return for the grant of staff privileges would not
implicate the fraud and abuse laws. This means that credentialing policies by
which hospitals consider, and potentially deny, staff privileges based on
conflicts of interest or any other legitimate competitive or business concerns
would not violate the anti-kickback statute. n282 Moreover, credentialing
policies requiring that a minimum number of procedures be performed at the
hospital to assure proficiency or sufficient physician familiarity with the
facility's operations would not violate the fraud and abuse laws since these
requirements are intended to achieve quality or administrative/business goals,
not to induce referrals. n283 Hospitals that  [*753]  implement these types of
competitive credentialing policies could rest assured that these practices would
be free from scrutiny under the fraud and abuse laws. n284

   Conclusion

 Looking at all of the activities related to economic credentialing - judicial
decisions, state laws, the GAO reports on specialty hospitals, and OIG fraud
enforcement activities - the most significant observation is not the limited
circumstances under which economic credentialing is prohibited, but all of the
circumstances in which it is not. Courts have found decidedly that competitive
credentialing by hospitals has a potential to violate antitrust n285 or contract
law, or to constitute arbitrary administrative action, only in very limited
circumstances. n286 State laws reinforce that most types of economic
credentialing are permissible. n287 Finally, it appears likely that only a
narrow type of competitive credentialing policy, i.e., where privileges are
expressly conditioned upon referrals, will be deemed to violate the
anti-kickback law. n288

   Although there are multiple indicators that conflict of interest policies are
generally permissible, that status could change in the near future based on the
collection of key pieces of information that are still missing. First, the
[*754]  moratorium on use of the Stark "whole hospital exception" for new
specialty hospitals remains in place while the issue is being examined and
reports are being prepared. n289 Second, the OIG has not yet taken action based
upon its solicitation of comments on application of the fraud and abuse laws to
competitive credentialing, and it is uncertain whether the OIG even contemplates
taking action on this issue. n290 Movement on any one of these pending matters
has the potential to change the overall picture of competitive credentialing.

   But it is probably the claims related to patient rights raised in the Murphy
n291 case that have the greatest potential to create new policy on the issue of
competitive credentialing. The Murphy case showcases the issue of patient rights
by alleging that the state's predominant managed care plan has contracted with
the defendant hospitals as the plan's preferred hospital providers, n292 so that
termination of staff privileges by the defendant hospitals is a very heavy club
wielded by the hospitals to discourage the formation of competing
physician-owned facilities. Termination of staff privileges could effectively
cut physicians off from access to the majority of patients who are plan members.
But, more importantly, as found by the court when awarding a preliminary
injunction to the plaintiffs, n293 termination of staff physicians cuts off the
patient plan members from their physicians of choice, because the plan members
are either required or encouraged to use the preferred hospitals in order to
minimize cost sharing. n294 It was this interference in doctor-patient
relationships that convinced the Murphy court to issue the injunction. n295

   Comparison of the outcomes of the plaintiff physicians' motions for
injunctive relief in the Murphy and Berasi n296 cases illustrates the importance
of the patient rights issue. In Berasi, the challenge to competitive
credentialing involved only two competing professionals - the physicians versus
the hospitals. n297 The courts, to date, have not been very sympathetic to the
physicians' plights and largely have ruled against the physicians based on
[*755]  traditional principles of business and competition. n298 Murphy is the
first competitive credentialing case where the plaintiff physicians assert that
large numbers of patients in the practice area are affected by the physicians'
termination. This is the aspect of proof in prior competitive credentialing
cases that has been most lacking. We generally have not seen, in these prior
cases, testimony on behalf of the patient community, or from patients directly,
that patient access to high quality, economical medical treatment from the
patients' choice of providers is being curtailed.

   Not surprisingly, the credentialing practices that are most at risk under the
antitrust laws and the fraud and abuse laws are also those which are potentially
most harmful to consumers. Credentialing policies that substantially foreclose
choice of providers for consumers in need of hospital services are most likely
to exist where a hospital has market power. Concomitantly, it is the existence
of market power that may well cause the hospital's conduct to be contrary to the
antitrust laws. n299 Even where a hospital does not have market power, express
referral mandates still threaten to interfere in the physician-patient
relationship, by requiring the physician to refer a patient to a hospital that
the physician might not otherwise select based upon the patient's needs,
quality, cost, or managed care contracting arrangements. And it is precisely
these credentialing practices that likely will be most subject to challenge
under the fraud and abuse laws. n300

   Ultimately, it is likely that the issue of competitive credentialing will be
decided not by physicians or hospitals, but by their patients. n301 Hopefully,
the fact-finding regarding specialty hospitals, which is currently being
completed, will focus on whether these forms of physician-owned facilities offer
better healthcare choices that consumers have a right to access n302 or whether,
in the end, specialty hospitals or physician-owned ventures threaten consumers
by duplicating already existing facilities and, thereby, driving up costs or by
potentially depriving communities of necessary forms of care that general
hospitals can no longer afford to provide. Even if specialty hospitals and other
forms of physician-owned joint ventures are deemed to be valuable contributors
in the spectrum of healthcare providers, that does not necessarily mean that
physicians who own such facilities should either be permitted to make referrals
[*756]  to them or be entitled to hospital privileges from the general hospitals
with which they compete. n303

Legal Topics:

For related research and practice materials, see the following legal topics:
Healthcare LawAntitrust ActionsFacilitiesHealthcare LawBusiness Administration &
OrganizationHospital PrivilegesRestrictionsMergers & Acquisitions
LawAntitrustJoint Ventures

FOOTNOTES:




n1.  The grant of staff privileges after the applicant provider successfully
completes the credentialing process authorizes the provider to practice in the
hospital when his or her patients are admitted to the hospital. The provider,
however, is not an employee of the hospital. See, e.g., Engelstad v. Va. Mun.
Hosp., 718 F.2d 262, 267 (8th Cir. 1983) (explaining that "staff privileges do
not establish an employment contract with the hospital"); Craig W. Dallon,
Understanding Judicial Review of Hospitals' Physician Credentialing and Peer
Review Decisions, 73 Temp. L. Rev. 597, 605 (2000) (commenting that hospital
staff membership does not create an employment relationship with the hospital).
Although the provider has the ability to attend and treat his or her patients in
the hospital, the hospital does not control the treatment aspects of the
provider's practice. Id. The hospital merely opens its facilities for use by the
provider and imposes certain professional and administrative rules. Id. at
605-06. The provider renders medical care independent of the hospital and bills
patients or their insurers directly for that care. Id. at 606.





n2.  E.g., Dallon, supra note 1, at 599.





n3.  Id. at 622.





n4.  Complaint P 14-23, Berasi v. Ohio Health Corp. (C.P. Ct. of Franklin
County, Ohio Mar. 2, 2004) (No. 04CVA03-02406); Complaint P 64-112, Biddulph v.
HCA Inc. (Dist. Ct. 7th Jud. Dist. Bonneville County, Idaho Mar. 3, 2004) (No.
CV-2004-1219). See infra Part V.E for a discussion of both Berasi and Biddulph.





n5.  Murphy v. Baptist Health, No. CV2004-2002 (Cir. Ct. Ark. Mar. 22, 2004)
(order granting preliminary injunction). See infra Part V.E for a discussion of
Murphy.





n6.  See American Medical Association ("AMA"), Economic Credentialing - Issues
and Answers (2003), available at http://www.assn.org/ama/pub/category/10919.html
[hereinafter AMA Economic Credentialing] (defining economic credentialing as the
"use of economic criteria unrelated to quality of care or professional
competence in determining a physician's qualifications for initial or continuing
hospital medical staff membership or privileges"); accord Medical Society of the
State of New York ("MSSNY"), Economic Credentialing and Exclusive Contacts:
MSSNY Policy Paper 21, 24 (1992) [hereinafter MSSNY Policy Paper] (describing
economic credentialing as the use of economic criteria unrelated to quality to
ascertain whether a physician qualifies for medical staff membership or
privileges); California Medical Association ("CMA"), Exclusive Contracts and
Economic Credentialing: Potential for Abuse in the Quality Assurance System 4
(1991) [hereinafter CMA Economic Credentialing] (defining economic credentialing
as the use of economic criteria unrelated to quality to determine a physician's
eligibility for medical staff membership or privileges).





n7.  E.g., Marc S. Raspanti & David M. Laigaie, When Does Economic Credentialing
Violate the Anti-Kickback Statute?, in Health Law Handbook 307, 313-314 (Alice
G. Gosfield ed., 2002) (explaining the distinction between "hybrid" economic
credentialing and "pure" economic credentialing).





n8.  Id.





n9.  Id.





n10.  See id. at 319-20 (noting upholding of a hospital's refusal to extend
privileges to a physician whose admissions exceeded the average length of stay
and who allegedly performed unnecessary diagnostic tests) (citing Edelman v.
John F. Kennedy Mem'l Hosp., No. C-2104-80 (N.J. Super. Ct. Ch. Div. 1982),
cert. denied, 475 A.2d 585 (N.J. 1984)).





n11.  See Richard A. Feinstein, Economic Credentialling and Exclusive Contracts,
9 A.B.A. Health L. Sec.: The Health Law. 1, 5 (1996) (classifying excessive,
redundant testing and excessive denial letters as hybrid criteria); Raspanti &
Laigaie, supra note 7, at 314 (listing outpatient service utilization as a
hybrid criterion); see also Deborah S. Kolb et al., Economic Credentialing, 19
Topics in Health Care Fin. 58, 60-63 (1993) (detailing a range of hybrid
criteria).





n12.  Raspanti & Laigaie, supra note 7, at 314.





n13.  Id.





n14.  See, e.g., Kolb et al., supra note 11, at 62 (noting that a physician's
refusal to conform to Medicare reimbursement requirements led to the termination
of that physician's contract with a hospital) (citing Alonso v. Hosp. Auth. of
Henry County, 332 S.E.2d 884 (Ga. Ct. App. 1985)).





n15.  MSSNY Policy Paper, supra note 6, at 25; CMA Economic Credentialing, supra
note 6, at 8-10.





n16.  Strictly economic criteria that appear on both the New York and California
lists are: hospital fiscal viability; patient demographics; payor mix;
Medicare/Medicaid participation status; HMO/PPO/IPA or other third party
contracting status; resource utilization in dollars; charges comparison; use of
facilities in order to maximize current, projected, or desired hospital market
share; physician profit by reimbursement; physician profit by cost; market need
for particular specialty physician; malpractice risk exposure; commercial payor
profiles; allocation of hospital resources; staff development plans; admission
rates; comparative utilization of resources; physician diagnosis related group
("DRG") profiling comparing profitable DRG categories to non-profitable DRG
categories; and number of hospital-owned outpatient services utilized. The New
York list also includes the following criteria that do not appear on the
California list: membership on other medical staffs; faculty appointment at a
medical school; and office location. The California list includes the following
criteria that do not appear on New York's list: personal referral patterns; age
as a (staff) development rather than health status criterion; concurrent DRG
review; reimbursement based on ICD-9 or CPT-4 code; comparison of "alternative"
DRGs; operating room underutilization; low census; hospital-owned ambulatory
facility underutilization; and facility equipment maintenance. See also
Feinstein, supra note 11, at 5 (noting differences between the California and
New York classifications of economic credentialing criteria); John D. Blum,
Evaluation of Medical Staff Using Fiscal Factors: Economic Credentialing, 26 J.
Health & Hosp. L. 65, 66 (1993) (discussing factors the California Medical
Association believes should not be used in economic credentialing).





n17.  Dallon, supra note 1, at 612-13.





n18.  Id. at 616.





n19.  See, e.g., Berman v. Valley Hosp., 510 A.2d 673, 676 (N.J. 1986), (stating
that hospitals are quasi-public entities designed to serve the public (citing
Doe v. Bridgeton Hosp. Ass'n, Inc., 366 A.2d 641 (N.J. 1976), cert. denied, 433
U.S. 914 (1977))); see also Howard L. Lang, Economic Credentialing - Why It Must
Be Stopped, 5 Med. Staff Couns. 19, 24 (1991) (noting that the powers of
hospital governing boards are "deeply embedded in public aspects" and that "
hospitals are operated not for private ends, but for the benefit of the
public").





n20.  See, e.g., MSSNY Policy Paper, supra note 6, at 25 (noting that economic
credentialing can impair patient care); Lang, supra note 19, at 22 (stating that
"without hospital privileges, a physician loses the opportunity to practice the
medical profession to the fullest extent").





n21.  See MSSNY Policy Paper, supra note 6, at 24 (commenting that there is a
critical need to prevent economic considerations from affecting medical
decisions concerning the quality of patient care); Lang, supra note 19, at 24
(stating that "subversion of quality patient care to economic motivations must
be stopped"); see also Raspanti & Laigaie, supra note 7, at 311 (noting that the
economic credentialing inquiry is always whether the granting or renewing of a
physician's privileges will positively or negatively impact the bottom line).





n22.  See Lang, supra note 19, at 22 (noting that the exclusion of certain
physicians from privileges denies patients a choice of practitioners); Raspanti
& Laigaie, supra note 7, at 311 n.1 (citing various ways that economic
credentialing can have a negative impact on patients and physicians).





n23.  MSSNY Policy Paper, supra note 6, at 24; see also CMA Economic
Credentialing, supra note 6, at 5 (stating that "economics cannot be permitted
to dictate medical decisions"). But see Kevin E. Grady, Current Topics in
Medical Staff Development and Credentialing, 26 J. Health & Hosp. L. 193, 209
(1993) (concluding that a hospital can consider economic factors if its primary
focus is on better serving patients and the majority of the medical staff);
Michael J. Baxter, Exclusive Contracting: The Original Economic Credentialing,
26 J. Health & Hosp. L. 97, 102 (1993) (approving the use of exclusive
contracting, with its economic credentialing aspects, as long as quality of care
is not ignored in the search for ways to improve efficiency in medicine).





n24.  See MSSNY Policy Paper, supra note 6, at 26 (noting that some otherwise
qualified physicians may be excluded from hospitals due to exclusive contracts);
CMA Economic Credentialing, supra note 6, at 12 (explaining that exclusive
contracts foreclose the possibility of some physicians working in certain
hospital departments).





n25.  See, e.g., CMA Economic Credentialing, supra note 6, at 11 (recognizing
that California courts have upheld exclusive contracting arrangements when the
action was necessary to provide quality care).





n26.  See John D. Blum, Economic Credentialing: A New Twist in Hospital
Appraisal Processes, 12 J. Legal Med. 427, 429 (1991) (commenting that economic
credentialing is timely because of increased competition in the healthcare
market).





n27.  See John D. Blum, The Evolution of Physician Credentialing into Managed
Care Selective Contracting, 22 Am. J.L. & Med. 173, 180 (1996) (noting that
changes in hospital markets have necessitated that hospitals operate more
efficiently and, thus, consider economic factors); Dallon, supra note 1, at
622-23 (stating that "hospitals who operate under substantial economic pressures
have a strong incentive to consider economic factors at all levels of their
operations including credentialing decisions").





n28.  See Blum, supra note 26, at 472 (noting that hospital administrators
believe that third-party payers select hospitals based on the efficiency of each
hospital's medical staff); Dallon, supra note 1, at 622-24 (noting that
hospitals rely on economic and quality of care considerations in making
credentialing decisions).





n29.  Blum, supra note 26, at 430 (noting hospitals' "increasing awareness ...
that it is the medical staff that accounts for the most significant portion of
institutional revenues"); Donovan Riley, Economic Credentialing Survey of
University Teaching Hospitals, 47 Healthcare Fin. Mgmt. 42, 44 (1993) (noting
hospitals' "increased understanding of a physician's influence over utilization
of hospital resources and, therefore, a hospital's economic viability").





n30.  Blum, supra note 26, at 430; Riley, supra note 29, at 44; see also Blum,
supra note 16, at 71 (stating that "the notion that physicians will be judged
solely on the basis of clinical quality is unrealistic in the current climate of
health care"); Feinstein, supra note 11, at 4 (stating that "the marketplace is
exerting tremendous pressure on hospitals and other organizations to cut costs
and participate in integrated delivery systems in order to remain competitive,
particularly in the fierce competition for managed care contracts which control
an increasing percentage of patient "lives'").





n31.  Anita J. Slomski, Hospitals Wield a Heavy Club Against High-Cost Doctors,
68 Med. Econ. 57, 69 (1991) (quoting Robert H. Rosenfield, a partner at
McDermott, Will & Emery: "It would be reckless for trustees to be completely
unaware of how physicians are using hospital resources... . If board members
don't protect the assets of the hospital, they can be held personally liable by
the bond holders.").





n32.  A physician fee schedule typically is comprised of a list of every type of
medical treatment the physician could perform and assigns a set dollar amount to
be paid in reimbursement for each listed service. In contrast to fee schedules,
other forms of reimbursement methodologies require physicians to assume
financial risk. The most prevalent is capitation, whereby the physicians are
paid a set dollar amount per month per patient who is a plan subscriber.
Accordingly, each physician receives the set monthly amount per patient
subscriber, regardless of whether the patient requires extensive services from
the physician or none at all. The physician thereby is incentivized to practice
efficiently - to produce high quality care and healthy patients and not to
render unnecessary services. Otherwise, the physician's costs would increase,
but his reimbursement would not.





n33.  Elizabeth A. Weeks, The New Economic Credentialing: Protecting Hospitals
from Competition by Medical Staff Members, 36 J. Health L. 247, 247-48 (2003)
(stating that "physicians...argue that entrepreneurial activities are necessary
for them to meet the economic challenges posed by declining reimbursements and
rising insurance costs").





n34.  E.g., Letter from Beth Schermer, on behalf of the Arizona Hospital and
Healthcare Association, to Janet Rehnquist, Inspector General, Department of
Health and Human Services 3 (Feb. 5, 2003) (on file with the Office of the
Inspector General ("OIG")) (submitting comments in response to the OIG's request
for comments on the development of possible guidance concerning the application
of the anti-kickback statute to certain hospital credentialing arrangements for
physicians).





n35.  See United States General Accounting Office, Specialty Hospitals:
Geographic Location, Services Provided, and Financial Performance 1, 2 (2003),
available at http://www.gao.gov/cgi-bin/getrpt?GAO-04-167 [hereinafter
Geographic Location] (describing the origins and characteristics of specialty
hospitals).





n36.  See United States General Accounting Office, Specialty Hospitals:
Information on National Market Share, Physician Ownership, and Patients Served
1, 1 (2003), available at http://www.gao.gov/new.items/d03683r.pdf [hereinafter
Information on National Market Share] (stating that "representatives of general
hospitals contend that specialty hospitals concentrate on the most profitable
procedures"). Common types of specialty hospitals are cardiac and orthopedic,
the procedures for which tend to be "disproportionately high." Cara S. Lesser,
Specialty Hospitals: Market Impact and Policy Implications (2003), available at
http://www.ftc.gov/ogc/healthcarehearings/docs/lesser.pdf (presented at the
FTC/DOJ Hearings on Health Care and Competition Law and Policy, Mar. 27, 2003).





n37.  See Letter from Beth Schermer, supra note 34, at 4 (stating that
""cherry-picking' erodes the general hospital's ability to support essential
community services, such as obstetrical, pediatric and emergency care").





n38.  Riley, supra note 29, at 52.





n39.  Blum, supra note 26, at 430-31. See also Riley, supra note 29, at 42, 44
(noting the availability of computerized databases able to capture
physician-specific practice data).





n40.  See Riley, supra note 29, at 44 (noting "the introduction of competition
and cost containment as simultaneous principles of public and private policy in
hospital reimbursement" as a factor causing industry professionals to focus on
the economic credentialing of physicians).





n41.  Blum, supra note 26, at 472.





n42.  See id. at 429-30 (noting that managed care plans have forced hospitals to
contract with plans that have discounted rates below cost).





n43.  See United States Department of Justice and the Federal Trade Commission,
Statements of Antitrust Enforcement Policy in Health Care, Statement 8 (Aug.
1996) [hereinafter Statement 8] (describing the antitrust safe harbor),
available at http://www.usdoj.gov/atr/public/guidelines/0000.pdf; see also
Feinstein, supra note 11, at 10 (stating that "physicians ... are increasingly
imposing a form of economic credentialling upon themselves through groups and
networks that include shared economic risk as condition of participation").

   The antitrust "safe harbor" for physician network joint ventures imposes
requirements for substantial financial risk sharing plus limits on the numbers
of participating physicians. Statement 8, supra, at 75-77. Joint ventures that
fall within the safe harbor will not be challenged by the antitrust enforcement
agencies "absent extraordinary circumstances." Id. at 76-77.

   Even if safe harbor status is unavailable, and a physician network joint
venture does not engage in economic risk sharing, the venture will not be deemed
to be illegal per se if it engages in "clinical integration." Generally,
clinical integration requires the physicians in the network to develop
cooperative practice patterns, to monitor utilization and outcome, and to
control costs to produce high quality, efficient care. Id. at 72-73.





n44.  Id. at 89-92.





n45.  Raspanti & Laigaie, supra note 7, at 314-15.





n46.  Weeks, supra note 33, at 248-49. See also Ken Terry, Hospital Hardball:
Maine Physicians Are Being Pressured to Pick Sides in a Nasty Fight Over
Economic Credentialing, 79 Med. Econ. 72, 77 (2002) (reporting that the American
Medical Association is receiving more complaints from physicians who have been
excluded for hospital staffs because they practice at a competing institution).





n47.  See Weeks, supra note 33, at 249-50 (contending that hospitals implement
policies limiting or prohibiting physicians' economic conflicts of interest to
ensure physician loyalty and maintain economic viability); Terry, supra note 46,
at 77 (reporting that a group of cardiologists stopped receiving referrals from
a heart clinic after merging with another cardiovascular group).





n48.  See Weeks, supra note 33, at 263-64 (describing competitive credentialing
as "inherently anticompetitive because they force physicians to limit or forego
certain entrepreneurial or investment activities in order to maintain full staff
privileges at a general, acute-care facility, which arguably are essential for
most physicians' practices").





n49.  See, e.g., Rome Ambulatory Surgical Ctr., LLC v. Rome Mem'l Hosp., Inc.,
No. 5:01-CV-23 (N.D.N.Y. Dec. 22, 2004) (order granting in part and denying in
part defendants' motion for summary judgment and denying plaintiff's motion for
summary judgment). See infra Part V.D for a discussion of Rome Ambulatory
Surgical Center, LLC.





n50.  Report on Medicare Compliance, 12 Atlantic Info. Servs., Inc. 6, (Feb. 6,
2003) (stating that "if medical staff physicians with outside financial
interests in competing facilities refer the simpler patient cases that cost loss
to treat to their own facilities ... while referring the sicker patients to the
hospital, physicians will maximize their profits by spending less to treat
patients while forcing hospitals to eat the losses involved with sicker
patients").





n51.  The reimbursement rates developed by state Medicaid programs and private
payers, as well, may be based on a DRG reimbursement methodology. Robert F.
Blomquist, Health Maintenance Organizations and State DRG Hospital Cost Control
Programs: The Need for Federal Preemption, 10 Am. J.L. & Med. 1, 13 (1984).





n52.  The DRG rate is subject to certain adjustments to ameliorate the potential
for unfairness of using a standard rate for all similar diagnoses. Id. at 12-13.
For example, where a particular patient requires additional hospitalization
beyond the standard inpatient stay, cases known as "outliers," the methodology
allows the rate to be increased to compensate the hospital for its added costs
of treatment. Id. at 13.





n53.  See id. at 12-13 (describing how 383 DRGs were created to "aggregate wide
differences in patient length of stay within DRG categories").





n54.  The DRG reimbursement methodology was designed to promote efficiency and
to discourage hospitals from overextending patient stays in order to receive
greater reimbursement under the prior reimbursement system, which paid a fixed
sum per day of inpatient hospitalization (the "per diem rate"). Id. at 12.





n55.  Report on Medicare Compliance, supra note 50, at 6 (stating that the DRG
system is "designed to ensure reimbursement is fair when spread out over a case
mix with varying severity of illness").





n56.  See id. (asserting that economic dumping "distorts a payment system
designed to ensure reimbursement is fair when spread out over a case mix with
varying severity of illness").





n57.  Catholic Healthcare Partners is reported to have stated in a letter to the
OIG that the threat to hospitals is from "potentially predatory self-referrals
by physicians that artificially manipulate the DRG population served by each
facility, to the clear detriment of the community safety net hospital and the
clearly unfair economic benefit of the specialty or boutique facility." Report
on Medicare Compliance, supra note 50, at 6. See also Letter from Rick Pollack,
on behalf of the American Hospital Association, to Janet Rehnquist, Inspector
General, Department of Heath and Human Services 5 (Feb. 5, 2003) (on file with
OIG) (stating that "hospital policies that protect those vital community
obligations [the provision of necessary medical care by hospitals without regard
to ability to pay] from being undermined by the narrow economic interests of a
specialty provider are both legitimate and appropriate").





n58.  Letter from Beth Schermer, supra note 34, at 5.





n59.  Id.





n60.  Id.





n61.  15 U.S.C. 1-2 (1997).





n62.  E.g., Friedman v. Del. County Mem'l Hosp., 672 F. Supp. 171, 190-91 (E.D.
Pa. 1987), aff'd, 849 F.2d 600 (3d Cir. 1988). See infra Part V.B for a
discussion of Friedman.





n63.  Friedman, 672 F. Supp. at 190-91.





n64.  Clark C. Havighurst & Nancy M. P. King, Private Credentialing of Health
Care Personnel: An Antitrust Perspective, 9 Am. J.L. & Med. 263, 298 (1983)
(stating that "nondominant organizations ... should be free from antitrust
scrutiny altogether").





n65.  See, e.g., Ball Mem'l Hosp., Inc. v. Mut. Hosp. Ins., Inc., 603 F. Supp.
1077, 1080 (S.D. Ind. 1985) (stating that if the defendant insurer, held by the
court to lack market power, raised its premiums above prevailing market levels,
customers would simply abandon this insurer and contract with an alternate
carrier), aff'd, 784 F.2d 1325 (7th Cir. 1986).





n66.  See, e.g., Jefferson Parish Hosp. Dist. No. 2 v. Hyde, 466 U.S. 2, 26-27
(1984) (stating that the percentage of an area's residents who are patients at a
particular hospital is not a dispositive indicator of market power). See infra
Part V.C for a further discussion of these issues.





n67.  See, e.g., Belmar v. Cipolla, 475 A.2d 533, 538 (N.J. 1984) (holding in
part that courts will refrain from interfering with a hospital's decision to
change staff privileges, as long as the hospital's decision furthers its
healthcare mission).





n68.  See, e.g., Balaklaw v. Lovell, 14 F.3d 793, 798-99 (2d Cir. 1994) (holding
that a hospital's termination of an exclusive anesthesiology contract with the
plaintiff did not significantly impair the market for anesthesiology services).





n69.  See, e.g., Koefoot v. Am. Coll. of Surgeons, 652 F. Supp. 882, 888 (N.D.
Ill. 1986) (applying the rule of reason analysis to facially legitimate non-
economic professional ethical rules).





n70.  See, e.g., Kreuzer v. Am. Acad. of Periodontology, 735 F.2d 1479, 1490
(D.C. Cir. 1984) (quoting from N. Pac. Ry. Co. v. United States, 356 U.S. 1, 5
(1958), that per se agreements are "presumed to be unreasonable" and "manifestly
anticompetitive," because of their ""pernicious effect on competition and lack
[of] any redeeming virtue ... .'").





n71.  Kreuzer, 735 F.2d at 1492-94; see Blum, supra note 27, at 179 (stating
that majority of antitrust violations are decided under a rule of reason
analysis).





n72.  See, e.g., Friedman, 672 F. Supp. at 190-91 (dismissing a claim under the
rule of reason because the plaintiff physician negatively impacted the
hospital's efficiency and competitiveness). See infra Part V.B for a further
discussion of Friedman.





n73.  15 U.S.C. 2 (1997). "Every person who shall monopolize, or attempt to
monopolize, or combine or conspire with any person or persons, to monopolize any
part of the trade or commerce among the several States, or with foreign nations,
shall be deemed guilty of a felony ... ." Id.





n74.  Friedman, 672 F. Supp at 194; McKenzie-Willamette Hosp. v. Peacehealth,
No. 02-6032-HA, 2003 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16203, at 9-10 (D. Or. Aug. 15, 2003). See
infra Part V.B for a further discussion of these issues.





n75.  See Blum, supra note 27, at 179 (stating that hospitals have successfully
characterized their staffing decisions "legitimate operational considerations");
Leonard A. Hagen, Comment, Physician Credentialing: Economic Criteria Compete
with the Hippocratic Oath, 31 Gonz. L. Rev. 427, 454 (1995/1996) (noting that
when economic credentialing is properly applied it does not result in an
antitrust violation); Weeks, supra note 33, at 255-56 (asserting that most
challenges to medical staff determinations brought under section 1 of the
Sherman Anti-Trust Act have failed).





n76.  672 F. Supp. 171,174 (E.D. Pa. 1987), aff'd, 849 F.2d 600 (3d Cir. 1988).





n77.  Friedman, 672 F. Supp. at 173.





n78.  Id. at 178-79, 190.





n79.  Id. at 188-90.





n80.  Id. at 189-90.





n81.  Id. at 190.





n82.  Friedman, 672 F. Supp. at 190-91 (stating that "since a hospital cannot
conspire with itself, there can be no conspiracy as a matter of law").





n83.  Id. at 175, 194.





n84.  Id. at 194-95.





n85.  Id.; see also Kerth v. Hamot Health Found. Inc., 989 F. Supp. 691, 704-05
(W.D. Pa. 1997) (holding that the hospital's termination of the plaintiff
physician's staff privileges for the physician's failure to attain the minimum
number of open heart surgeries per year that the hospital deemed to be
sufficient to maintain technical proficiency withstood the plaintiff's Sherman
section 1 claims because the plaintiff failed to prove the conspiracy element),
aff'd mem., 159 F.3d 1351 (3d Cir. 1998); Hassan v. Indep. Practice Assocs.,
P.C., 698 F. Supp. 679, 691-97 (E.D. Mich. 1988) (finding that an HMO's
termination of and refusal to readmit the plaintiff physicians as network
members, due to their overutilization of allergy tests, withstood Sherman
section 1 claims because the HMO's policy to prevent excessive use of costly
tests was a procompetitive cost containment measure; because the HMO, with only
a twenty percent market share, did not possess market power; and because there
was no detrimental impact on competition overall).





n86.  See Dallon, supra note 1, at 639 ("Courts increasingly have relied on a
contract theory to allow limited judicial review of hospital credentialing and
peer review decisions. Under this view, medical staff bylaws constitute a
contract between a physician who enjoys medical staff privileges and the
hospital.").





n87.  Id.





n88.  465 N.E.2d 554 (Ill. App. Ct. 1984).





n89.  Knapp, 465 N.E.2d at 560-61.





n90.  Id. at 563.





n91.  Id. at 565; see also Rao v. St. Elizabeth's Hosp. of the Hosp. Sisters of
the Third Order of St. Francis, 488 N.E.2d 685, 697 (Ill. App. Ct. 1986)
(limiting its review of the hospital's permanent suspension of the plaintiff's
staff privileges due to, inter alia, overutilization of glucose tolerance tests
to whether the hospital's procedures violated its bylaws); Edelman v. John F.
Kennedy Mem'l Hosp., No. C-2104-80 (N.J. Super. Ct. Ch. Div. 1982) (upholding
the hospital's denial of the plaintiff physician's staff reappointment on the
basis of utilization review data that indicated excessive lengths of stay and
use of unnecessary diagnostic tests, which the hospital argued had resulted in
excessive costs to the hospital).





n92.  466 U.S. 2 (1984).





n93.  Jefferson Parish Hosp., 466 U.S. at 5.





n94.  Id. at 7, 26-27.





n95.  Id. at 31.





n96.  912 F.2d 138 (6th Cir. 1990).





n97.  Beard, 912 F.2d at 145.





n98.  Id. See also Redding v. St. Francis Med. Ctr., 208 Cal. App. 3d 98, 102,
104-06 (Cal. Ct. App. 1989) (upholding the hospital's right to change its
open-staffing heart surgery program to a closed exclusive program, thereby
restricting the plaintiff's right to perform independent bypass surgery at the
hospital, in order to improve quality and finding that the hospital's interest
in fostering higher standards, teamwork, and dedication, which hopefully would
lead to lower mortality rates, was not "substantively irrational, unlawful,
contrary to established public policy, or procedurally unfair" and outweighed
the potential adverse economic impact on the plaintiff). Similarly, plaintiffs
have not been successful in asserting antitrust claims against non-hospital
healthcare entities for exclusive contracting practices. See, e.g., Capital
Imaging Assocs. v. Mohawk Valley Med. Assocs., Inc., 996 F.2d 537, 547 (2d Cir.
1993) (finding that a plaintiff's exclusion from an independent practice
association's ("IPA") network did not violate Sherman section 1, because the IPA
did not possess market power); U.S. Healthcare, Inc. v. Healthsource, Inc., 986
F.2d 589, 598-99 (1st Cir. 1993) (finding that an exclusive contract between an
HMO and its participating physicians did not violate sections 1 and 2 of the
Sherman Act because the plaintiff had not established that there had been any
harmful impact to the market as a whole).





n99.  See, e.g., Bellam v. Clayton County Hosp. Auth., 758 F. Supp. 1488, 1493
(N.D. Ga. 1990) (denying Sherman sections 1 and 2 claims challenging a
hospital's exclusive anesthesiology contract because the hospital's legitimate
quality goals rebutted the plaintiff's antitrust conspiracy allegations and the
plaintiff failed to establish that the hospital had market power); Belmar, 475
A.2d at 544 (upholding an exclusive anesthesiology contract against state
antitrust claims because the plaintiff had failed to prove harm to the market as
a whole and no per se illegality because an exclusive arrangement "permits more
efficient hospital administration"); Dattilo v. Tucson Gen. Hosp., 533 P.2d 700,
703-05 (Ariz. Ct. App. 1975) (concluding that the benefits of efficiency and
economy of the hospital's exclusive nuclear medicine contract outweighed the
harm to an excluded physician).





n100.  Bocombo v. Radiology Consultants of South Jersey, No. 02-1697(JEI), 2004
U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2733, at 12-13 (D.N.J. Feb. 25, 2004) (denying the plaintiff's
Sherman sections 1 and 2 and state law antitrust claims, which arose from the
plaintiff's loss of business, premised upon his displacement when the defendant
hospitals changed their exclusive radiology provider arrangements because the
court found no evidence that the plaintiff's exclusion had a negative impact on
competition in the relevant market); Steuer v. Nat'l Med. Enter., Inc., 672 F.
Supp. 1489, 1511, 1515-18 (D.S.C. 1987) (denying the plaintiff's Sherman section
1 claim, challenging the hospital's substitution of its sole pathology provider,
for failure to establish that the hospital had market power, to prove the
conspiracy element, and to show that the overall market had been harmed).





n101.  861 F.2d 1440 (9th Cir. 1988).





n102.  Oltz, 861 F.2d at 1446-47.





n103.  Id. at 1443-44.





n104.  Id. at 1451.





n105.  Id. at 1448.





n106.  Id. at 1442.





n107.  However, the court held that, in view of this clear showing of market
injury, a detailed market analysis was unnecessary, "because market definition
and market power are merely tools designed to uncover competitive harm, proof of
"actual detrimental effects, such as a reduction of output, can obviate the need
... [for] elaborate market analysis.'" Oltz, 861 F.2d at 1448 (citing F.T.C. v.
Ind. Fed'n of Dentists, 476 U.S. 447, 460-61 (1986)).





n108.  The recent case of Sisters of Providence in Washington v. A.A. Pain
Clinic, Inc., 81 P.3d 989 (Alaska 2003), like Oltz, is one of the few cases in
which an excluded physician successfully challenged, on an antitrust claim, an
exclusive contract between a hospital and an anesthesiology group. Id. at 1003.
In Sisters of Providence, the excluded plaintiff demonstrated that the hospital
had market power by noting "around sixty to sixty-five percent of hospital
patients in Anchorage "run through Providence.'" Id. at 1001. In addition, the
plaintiff demonstrated harm to the market because the exclusive anesthesiology
provider was so understaffed that, due to the restrictions of the exclusive
arrangement, hospital inpatients were unable to obtain the necessary pain
management services. Id. at 1003-04.





n109.  See supra Part V.A for a discussion of the difficulties in sustaining a
Sherman Anti-Trust Act claim.





n110.  Most courts have accepted the proposition that a hospital's medical staff
bylaws constitute an enforceable contract between the hospital and its staff
physicians. Accordingly, if the hospital takes an action, with regard to a staff
member, that is inconsistent with the bylaws, the staff member may challenge the
action as a breach of contract. See, e.g., Lewisburg Cmty. Hosp., Inc. v.
Alfredson, 805 S.W.2d 756, 759-61 (Tenn. 1991). See also Dallon, supra note 1,
at 640 n.288 (citing numerous examples of judicial findings that bylaws
constitute contracts).





n111.  No. 03A01-9305-CH-186, 1993 WL 481402 (Tenn. Ct. App. Nov. 18, 1993).





n112.  Lister, 1993 WL 481402, at 1.





n113.  Id. at 2. See also City of Cookeville v. Humphrey, 126 S.W.3d 897, 902-03
(Tenn. 2004) (upholding, as permissible under state law and under medical staff
bylaws, the hospital's decision to enter into an exclusive contract for
radiological services); Alonso v. Hosp. Auth. of Henry County, 332 S.E.2d 884,
887 (Ga. Ct. App. 1985) (upholding the termination of a contract between a
hospital and its chief pathologist, finding that the plaintiff's refusal to
abide by new Medicare/Medicaid reimbursement rules, and the hospital's
consequent inability to recover approximately $ 25,000 in reimbursements over
six months constituted just cause for the hospital to terminate the contract).





n114.  805 S.W.2d 756 (Tenn. 1991).





n115.  Lewisburg Cmty. Hosp., Inc., 805 S.W.2d at 759.





n116.  Id. at 761.





n117.  See Dallon, supra note 1, at 663 (observing that a number of courts allow
judicial review of credentialing decisions based on public policy grounds).





n118.  E.g., Lewin v. St. Joseph Hosp., 146 Cal. Rptr. 892, 905-06 (Cal. Dist.
Ct. App. 1978) (holding that a hospital's decision to operate its hemodialysis
unit on a closed basis to "provide the best patient care at the lowest cost" was
not "substantively irrational, arbitrary, capricious or wholly lacking in
evidentiary support").





n119.  582 F. Supp. 425 (N.D. Ga. 1984).





n120.  Mays, 582 F. Supp. at 429.





n121.  These are referred to as companion cases because they presented similar
issues and were decided in similar fashions by the same court on the same day.





n122.  510 A.2d 662 (N.J. 1986).





n123.  510 A.2d 673 (N.J. 1986).





n124.  Berman, 510 A.2d at 676 (stating that restrictive admissions policies
must serve a legitimate public health objective); see also Desai, 510 A.2d at
668 (stating that a closed-staff admissions policy "will be upheld if the
public-health objective is rationally advanced by the hospital's staff
admissions policy").





n125.  Desai, 510 A.2d at 664.





n126.  Id. at 669-70. The Desai court stated that its authority to review the
hospital's closed staff decision was derived from the principle that hospitals'
"health-care powers are deeply impressed with a public interest and are
fiduciary in nature," so that the court had a right of review to determine
whether that fiduciary authority was "exercised reasonably for the public good."
Id. at 668.





n127.  Id. at 670-71.





n128.  Id.





n129.  Berman, 510 A.2d at 677.





n130.  Id. at 679-80.





n131.  Id. at 679.





n132.  Id. at 680.





n133.  Id. See also Kessel v. Monongalia County Gen. Hosp., 600 S.E.2d 321, 333
(W. Va. 2004) (finding that a quasi-public hospital was not justified in
entering into an exclusive contract for cardiac anesthesia services when the
hospital could have adopted a less extreme measure, such as a preferential
contract that designated a primary provider for the services but also allowed
access to other providers upon patient request, although the court acknowledged
"that the weight of authority appears to support the right of hospitals to
execute exclusive contracts").





n134.  See, e.g., Complaint at 2, Murphy v. Baptist Health, 2004 U.S. Dist.
LEXIS 12080 (D. Ark. Feb. 24, 2004) (No. CV2004-2002); Complaint at 2, Berasi v.
Ohio Health Corp. (C.P. Ct. of Franklin County, Ohio Mar. 2, 2004) (No.
04CVA03-02406); Complaint at 2, Biddulph v. HCA Inc. (Dist. Ct. 7th Jud. Dist.
Bonneville County, Mar. 3, 2004) (No. CV-2004-1219). See infra Part V.E for
further discussions of Murphy, Berasi, and Biddulph.





n135.  See, e.g., Tarabishi v. McAlester Reg'l Hosp., 951 F.2d 1558, 1567-71
(10th Cir. 1991). In Tarabishi, after the hospital opposed the plaintiff's
development of an outpatient surgical clinic because the clinic would compete
with a new outpatient surgical department established by the hospital, the
hospital initiated several investigations into the plaintiff's patient care at
the hospital and, ultimately, revoked the plaintiff's staff privileges. Id. at
1562. Despite the fact that the hospital was the only hospital in McAlester,
Oklahoma, the court held that the plaintiff had failed to present any evidence
of market power, had failed to prove the existence of a conspiracy, and had
failed to show any impact upon competition as a whole, defeating the plaintiff's
Sherman sections 1 and 2 claims. Id. at 1561, 1568, 1571. But see Weeks, supra
note 33, at 263-64 (commenting that hospitals' conflict of interest policies
"are inherently anticompetitive because they force physicians to limit or forego
certain entrepreneurial or investment activities in order to maintain full staff
privileges at a general, acute-care facility, which arguably are essential for
most physicians' practices").





n136.  Coffey v. Healthtrust, Inc., 955 F.2d 1388, 1393 (10th Cir. 1992); see
also Howerton v. Grace Hosp., Inc., No. 4:90CV187, 1995 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 21123
(W.D.N.C. July 7, 1995) (holding that the plaintiffs failed to show harm to
market when the hospital terminated the plaintiffs' exclusive radiology contract
and contracted with another exclusive provider after the plaintiffs established
a freestanding radiology facility that directly competed with the hospital),
aff'd mem., 96 F.3d 1438 (4th Cir. 1996); Univ. Emergency Physicians, P.C. v.
Richmond County Hosp. Auth., No. CV182-143, 1982 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17227, at 20
(S.D. Ga. Nov. 11, 1982) (holding that to require the hospital to continue an
exclusive contract with the plaintiffs for operation of the hospital's emergency
room, when the plaintiffs sought to open competing freestanding emergency
clinics in the immediate area, would "seriously impair the hospital
administration's decision-making process").





n137.  See Cobb County-Kennestone Hosp. Auth. v. Prince, 249 S.E.2d 581, 588
(Ga. 1978). See infra note 168 for a discussion of Cobb County.





n138.  Rosenblum v. Tallahassee Mem'l Reg'l Med. Ctr., No. 91-589, slip. op. at
3 (Cir. Ct. Fla. June 18, 1992). See infra notes 163-69 and accompanying text
for a discussion of Rosenblum.





n139.  No. 89-30084-RV, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 20853 (N.D. Fla. May 28, 1993).





n140.  Williamson, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 20853, at 127.





n141.  Id. at 105.





n142.  Id. at 154, 156.





n143.  309 F.3d 836 (5th Cir. 2002).





n144.  Surgical Care Ctr. of Hammond, 309 F.3d at 841.





n145.  Id. at 842.





n146.  Id. at 843.





n147.  800 F.2d 568 (6th Cir. 1986).





n148.  Potters Med. Ctr., 800 F.2d at 581.





n149.  Id. at 570. The plaintiffs also sued Jackman S. Vodrey, attorney for the
defendant hospital and a member of its Board of Trustees, and J. W. Schoolnic,
M.D., a senior member of the defendant hospital's medical staff and chairman of
its Department of Internal Medicine. Id.





n150.  Id. at 571.





n151.  Id. at 573. The court found that, as a matter of law, the defendants
Vodrey and Schoolnic lacked the capacity to conspire with the defendant hospital
as "it is well settled that "officers or employees of the same firm do not
provide the plurality of actors imperative for a section 1 conspiracy.'" Potters
Med. Ctr., 800 F.2d at 573 (quoting Copperweld Corp. v. Independence Tube Corp.,
467 U.S. 752, 769 (1984)).





n152.  Id. at 574. From the few facts concerning market power that the opinion
states, it appears at least conceivable that the defendant was a monopolist,
because the plaintiff and the defendant hospitals were the only two hospitals in
East Liverpool, Ohio, and the defendant hospital outsized the plaintiff hospital
in terms of number of inpatient beds by a ratio of more than seven to one. Id.
at 570.





n153.  Id. at 575-76, 580.





n154.  Id. at 581. See also Miller v. Indiana Hosp., 843 F.2d 139, 140, 144-45
(3d Cir. 1988) (reversing a grant of summary judgment to the defendant hospital
and reinstating the plaintiff's federal and state antitrust claims on the basis
that the hospital's stated justification for terminating the plaintiff's staff
privileges could be a sham and that the termination might actually be
retaliation for the plaintiff's establishing a medical office building located
two miles from the hospital, which competed against the hospital for laboratory
and radiology services and which the plaintiff planned to expand into a
comprehensive family-oriented medical center); cf. Reazin v. Blue Cross & Blue
Shield, Inc., 635 F. Supp. 1287, 1327-28, 1332-33 (D. Kan. 1986) (denying
summary judgment to the defendant health plan and finding that its termination
of the plaintiff hospital as participating provider supported the plaintiff's
Sherman sections 1 and 2 claims, where the plaintiff had asserted proof of the
defendant health plan's conspiracy, market power, and detrimental impact on
competition and where the defendant had failed to assert any legitimate business
reasons for the termination), aff'd, 899 F.2d 951 (10th Cir. 1990); Blue Cross
of Wash. and Alaska v. Kitsap Physicians Serv., No. C81-918V, 1981 WL 2198, at
4-6 (W.D. Wash. Oct. 28, 1981) (awarding a preliminary injunction to the
plaintiff health insurer based upon the insurer's allegations that the defendant
health insurer had entered into exclusive provider contracts with all but three
of the physicians in a three-county area, foreclosing the plaintiff's ability to
establish a physician network to service the plaintiff's subscribers, because
the defendant could meet its competitive goals in a manner that would be less
harmful to competition).





n155.  No. 5:01-CV-23, slip op. at 52 (N.D.N.Y. Dec. 22, 2004).





n156.  Rome Ambulatory Surgical Ctr., LLC, slip op. at 1-3.





n157.  Id. at 4. The Federal Trade Commission reportedly is investigating, on
alleged antitrust violations, the Eastern New Mexico Medical Center in Roswell
for attempting to exclusively contract with local payers to shut out competing
hospitals, in apparent response to an announcement by the Center for Ambulatory
Surgery & Endoscopy of Southeastern New Mexico that it planned to break ground
later this year on a twenty-six-bed acute care hospital in Roswell that would
compete directly with the medical center. Late News: FTC Investigates N.M.
Hospital, 34 Mod. Healthcare, Apr. 12, 2004, at 4.





n158.  Rome Ambulatory Surgical Ctr., LLC, slip op. at 10.





n159.  Id. at 10. However, the bylaw was later removed. Id.





n160.  Id. at 52.





n161.  Id.





n162.  No. 91-589, slip op. at 4-5 (Fla. Cir. Ct. June 18, 1992).





n163.  Rosenblum, slip op. at 4.





n164.  Fla. Stat. Ann. 395.011(5) (2002) (renumbered as 395.0191(4) and amended
1992, ch. 92-289, 11, effective Oct. 1, 1992).





n165.  Rosenblum, slip op. at 3-4.





n166.  Id.





n167.  Id. at 4.





n168.  Id. at 3. Some commentators have suggested that the Rosenblum case is of
limited precedential value because the plaintiff was applying for appointment,
not renewal (where greater procedural protections are typically afforded through
the medical staff bylaws), and because the Florida statute granted wide
credentialing discretion to hospitals. See Hagen, supra note 75, at 452
(explaining how Rosenblum has been interpreted in different ways; some argue it
was decided on narrow facts, while others argue that the decision shows
"judicial tolerance" for economic credentialing); Terese Hudson, Factoring in
the Financials: Court Gives Nod to Economic Credentialing, 67 Hosp. & Health
Networks 36, 36 (1993) (describing Rosenblum as a case that was decided on
"unusual facts" which may be "difficult to apply in other situations"); Jane C.
Taber & Janna P. King, Caught in the Crossfire: Economic Credentialing in the
Health Care War, 1994 Detroit C. L. Rev. 1179, 1210 (1994) (noting that
Rosenblum has limited precedential value since it was a lower court opinion and
was largely dependent on Florida statutory law); see also Cobb County, 249
S.E.2d at 583, 588 (upholding a hospital rule requiring patients to have their
brain scans performed on the hospital's scanner, a rule that the hospital had
adopted in response to the establishment of a competing freestanding brain scan
facility, as "a reasonable and rational administrative decision" reflecting "a
well intentioned effort by the [Hospital] Authority to deal with the intricate
and complex task of providing comprehensive medical services to the citizens of
our state").





n169.  621 N.W.2d 150 (S.D. 2001).





n170.  Mahan<cedil> 621 N.W.2d at 155-56.





n171.  Id. at 152-53.





n172.  Id.





n173.  Id. at 154-55.





n174.  Id. at 155-56. See also Lister v. Methodist Med. Ctr. of Oak Ridge, 1993
WL 481402, at 2 (Tenn. Ct. App. Nov. 18, 1993) (finding that its medical staff
bylaws did not prevent a hospital from affecting anesthesiology privileges by
entering into an exclusive anesthesiology contract, because the bylaws related
only to actions that affected staff privileges related to competence, not to
actions that affected staff privileges due to the hospital's business
considerations). But see Lewisburg Cmty. Hosp., Inc., 805 S.W.2d at 756-57
(holding that termination of an exclusive radiological services contract without
hearing breached the bylaws, because the bylaws constituted a contract between
staff and the hospital, the termination significantly reduced the defendant
radiologist's staff privileges, and the bylaws required notice and hearing
whenever the board took unilateral action to reduce privileges).

   Some commentators have suggested that economic credentialing policies
unilaterally implemented by a hospital's board may run afoul of Joint Commission
on Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations ("JCAHO") standards, which require
that professional criteria for credentialing be specified in the medical staff
bylaws. JCAHO standard M.S.4.2.2. See Lang, supra note 19, at 23. However, a
strict reading of the JCAHO standards shows that they appear to apply
exclusively to quality assessments, see M.S.4.2.2.1 ("the criteria are designed
to assure the medical staff and governing body that patients will receive
quality care"), so that financial and business concerns are appropriately the
exclusive province of the board, and the JCAHO standards do not require that
competitive rules be incorporated into the staff bylaws or that competitive
decisions be approved by medical staff. Harold Bressler, general counsel for
JCAHO, is reported to have declared that "JCAHO standards are intended to ensure
competency of care ... . Once an institution has demonstrated competence among
its physicians, JCAHO standards do not care whether hospitals require physicians
to have green hair or stand on their heads ... ." After Federal Judge Finds No
Jurisdiction, Cardiologists File State Action on Kickbacks, 13 Health L. Rep.
(BNA) 315, 316 (2004) [hereinafter After Federal Judge].

   Concerns also have been raised that economic credentialing threatens the loss
of antitrust immunity under the Health Care Quality Improvement Act ("HCQIA"),
42 U.S.C. 11101-11152 (2000). E.g., Hagen, supra note 75, at 455-56 (noting that
pure economic credentialing could nullify HCQIA immunity, except possibly where
"the decision was made to further a state mandate of affordable access to
care"). HCQIA offers immunity to physicians who participate in peer review
decisions when the physicians act under "the reasonable belief that the action
was in the furtherance of quality health care." 42 U.S.C. 11112(a)(1). However,
purely economic credentialing is more likely to be performed by hospital
managers than staff physicians, so that HCQIA immunity for staff physicians is
unlikely to be applicable.

   Finally, the Medicare Conditions of Participation do not appear to prohibit
hospitals from considering economic criteria when the hospitals determine
medical staff appointments. 42 C.F.R. 482.12(a)(1-7) (2003).





n175.  Mahan, 621 N.W.2d at 156. See also Walborn v. UHHS/CSAHS-Cuyahoga, Inc.,
No. CV-02-479572, slip op. at Conclusions of Law P 23 (C.P. Cuyahoga County,
Ohio 2003) (finding that a conflict of interest policy adopted by the hospital
was "a reasonable means of protecting [the hospital's] continued viability"),
appeal dismissed per stipulation (2003).





n176.  Mahan, 621 N.W.2d at 161 n.8.





n177.  These cases are in keeping with other healthcare cases that have enforced
do-not-compete agreements, as long as the agreements are reasonable and not
harmful to the public. See, e.g., Woman's Clinic, Inc. v. St. John's Health
Sys., Inc., 252 F. Supp. 2d 857, 871-72 (W.D. Mo. 2002) (finding a covenant
not-to-compete for a five-year duration and for a twenty-five-mile radius to be
reasonable to protect interest of healthcare network); Murfreesboro Med. Clinic,
P.A. v. Udom, No. M2003-00313-COA-R9-CV, 2004 Tenn. App. LEXIS 77, at 13-14
(Jan. 30, 2004) (upholding a non-compete agreement by a clinic against a
formerly employed physician, finding that it was reasonable in time (eighteen
months) and scope (twenty-five-mile radius), and did not harm the public, but
remanding on the reasonableness of the buy-out dollar amount). See also Cogan v.
Harford Mem'l Hosp., 843 F. Supp. 1013, 1020 (D. Md. 1994) (ruling against the
plaintiff's Sherman sections 1 and 2 challenge to the defendant hospital's
requirement that an exclusive radiological contract include a do-not-compete
clause due to the plaintiff's failure to prove that the hospital had market
power and that its policy had injured trade). But see Weeks, supra note 33, at
285 (stating that conflict of interest policies "inherently restrict
competition" and that courts' decisions that such policies are reasonable
business decisions by hospitals to maintain economic viability are "questionable
under traditional antitrust policies").





n178.  See Mahan, 621 N.W.2d at 157 (stating that where the corporate bylaws
delegate certain duties to the staff, including the assignment and curtailment
of privileges, the medical staff has a right to make recommendations regarding
those decisions); Lister, 1993 WL 481402, at 1 (noting that the hospital's
corporate bylaws provide that a decrease in clinical privileges for reasons of
clinical competence gives rise to a right of hearing by a staff member). See
supra notes 169-77 and accompanying text for a discussion of Mahan and notes
111-13 and accompanying text for a discussion of Lister.





n179.  See City of Cookeville, 126 S.W.3d at 903 (stating that the hospital
board's decision to enter into an exclusive contract for radiological services
did not breach the medical staff bylaws because the bylaws provided that the
medical staff's input into such decisions was "advisory only"); Lewisburg Cmty.
Hosp., Inc., 805 S.W.2d at 761-62 (holding that a hospital board breached the
bylaws when the hospital board reduced a radiologist's clinical privileges
without following the hearing procedures described in the bylaws).





n180.  Complaint, Murphy v. Baptist Health (Cir. Ct. Pulaski County, Ark. Mar.
22, 2004) (No. CV2004-2002).





n181.  Complaint P 4, Murphy (No. CV2004-2002).





n182.  George Wells, Baptist Health Temporarily Enjoined From Using Economic
Credentialing Policy, 13 Health L. Rep. (BNA) 455, 456 (2004).





n183.  Complaint P 5, Murphy (No. CV2004-2002).





n184.  Id. PP 22-24.





n185.  Id. PP 34-52. See infra Part VIII.A for a discussion of the fraud and
abuse claims raised in Murphy.





n186.  Murphy v. Baptist Health, No. CV2004-2002, at 5 (Cir. Ct. Pulaski County,
Ark. Mar. 22, 2004) (order granting preliminary injunction).





n187.  Id. at 3-4.





n188.  Id. The court also interpreted section 5(A)(10) of the Arkansas
Department of Health Rules and Regulations for Hospitals and Related
Institutions as requiring hospitals to permit otherwise qualified physicians to
treat inpatients if the inpatients express a choice of treating physicians, as
long as the hospitals accept the patient's insurance coverage for any part of
the inpatient treatment. Id. at 3-4.





n189.  Wells, supra note 182, at 456.





n190.  After Federal Judge, supra note 174, at 315.





n191.  Berasi v. Ohio Health Corp., No. 04CVA03-02406 (C.P. Ct. of Franklin
County, Ohio Mar. 8, 2004) (order denying temporary restraining order).





n192.  Complaint, Berasi v. Ohio Health Corp. (C.P. Ct. of Franklin County, Ohio
Mar. 2, 2004) (No. 04CVA03-02406).





n193.  Id. P 8.





n194.  Id. PP 14-36.





n195.  OhioHealth Corporation/Doctors OhioHealth Corporation Board of Directors,
Resolution Regarding Restrictions on Medical Staff Appointments P 3, at 2 (Oct.
1, 2002) (on file with the Office of the General Counsel).





n196.  OhioHealth Corporation/Doctors OhioHealth Corporation, Physician Conflict
of Interest Fair Hearing Manual 5 (B), at 2.





n197.  Notice of Dismissal, Berasi v. Ohio Health Corp. (C.P. Ct. of Franklin
County, Ohio Mar. 8, 2004) (No. 04CVA-03-02406).





n198.  Doctors Who Sued Ohio Hospitals Over Revocation of Privileges Drop Suit,
13 Health L. Rep. (BNA) 363, 364 (2004).





n199.  Complaint, Biddulph v. HCA Inc. (Dist. Ct. 7th Jud. Dist. Bonneville
County, Idaho Mar. 3, 2004) (No. CV-2004-1219).





n200.  Complaint P 51, Biddulph (No. CV-2004-1219).





n201.  Id. PP 34-48.





n202.  Id. P 57.





n203.  Id. PP 65-75, 97-103, 105-112.





n204.  Id. P 3. The defendants have indicated that they will apply the same
criteria, but over a longer evaluation period. Complaint PP 3, 63, Biddulph (No.
CV-2004-1219). On August 6, 2004, the Biddulph court dismissed the plaintiffs'
claim under the Idaho Consumer Protection Act but allowed claims of tortious
interference and unlawful monopoly to proceed. The court stayed other issues
relating to the contemplated termination of the plaintiffs' staff privileges as
unripe due to the hospital's deferral in terminating the privileges. Counsel for
the plaintiffs announced that "the guts of this lawsuit remain intact." Suit by
Competing Physicians Allowed to Proceed Against Hospital, 13 Health L. Rep.
(BNA) 1240 (2004).





n205.  See Cal. Welf. & Inst. Code 14087.28(a) (2001) (prohibiting a hospital
from considering "the existence of a contract with the hospital or with others"
in making credentialing decisions); Colo. Rev. Stat. 25-3-103.7 (2003) (stating
that a hospital shall not "discriminate with regard to credentials or staff
privileges on the basis of whether a physician is an employee of, a physician
with staff privileges at, or a contracting physician with, the hospital"); R.I.
Gen. Laws 23-17-53 (2003) (stating that a hospital "may not refuse or fail to
grant or renew medical staff membership or staff privileges, or otherwise limit
or restrict medical staff membership or staff privileges, based in whole or in
part on the fact that the physician or a partner, associate, or employee of the
physician is providing medical or healthcare services at a different hospital,
hospital system, or on behalf of a health plan"); Tenn. Code Ann. 68-11-205(a),
(b) (2001) (limiting the ability of hospitals to restrict physicians' referral
decisions); Tex. Health & Safety Code 241.1015 (2004) (stating that a hospital
may not make credentialing decisions "based in whole or in part on the fact that
the physician or a partner, associate, or employee of the physician is providing
medical or health care services at a different hospital or hospital system").
While title 210, section 85/2(b)(1) of Illinois Compiled Statutes prohibits "the
inappropriate use of economic criteria in determining an individual's
qualifications for initial or continuing medical staff membership or privileges
[at hospitals]," the statute does not spell out which uses of economic criteria
are appropriate or inappropriate. (2000). The Massachusetts statute is similarly
vague. Mass. Gen. Laws Ann. Ch. 111, 51C (2003) (requiring hospitals to consider
applications for clinical privileges "solely on the basis of the individual
training, current competence, experience, ability, personal character and
judgment of the applicant," thereby raising questions as to whether the
consideration of economic criteria is prohibited or whether it might fall within
the ambit of "experience," a permissible consideration). But see Raspanti &
Laigaie, supra note 7, at 317 n.7 (characterizing section 41-3920 of the Idaho
Code, which prohibits hospitals from excluding physicians due to the physicians'
participation or employment with managed care organizations, as a statute that
restricts hospitals from engaging in economic credentialing).





n206.  See Cal. Welf. & Inst. Code 14087.28(a) (prohibiting a hospital from
considering "the existence of a contract with the hospital or with others" in
making credentialing decisions); R.I. Gen. Laws 23-17-53 (prohibiting a hospital
from "limiting a physician's participation or staff privileges...at a different
hospital, hospital system, or health plan"); Tex. Health & Safety Code Ann.
241.1015(b) (2004) (stating that a hospital may not "refuse or fail to grant or
renew staff privileges, or condition staff privileges" because the physician
provides medical or health care services to a different hospital).





n207.  See Colo. Rev. Stat. 25-3-103.7(3) (2003) (stating that "nothing in this
section shall be construed to allow any hospital which employs a physician ...
to refer exclusively to the hospital or the hospital's employed physicians").
See also Tenn. Code Ann. 68-11-205(b)(1)(B)(i)-(iii) (prohibiting hospitals from
interfering with the referral decisions of employed physicians).





n208.  See Fla. Stat. Ann. 395.0191 (2002) (permitting hospitals to consider
"such other elements as determined by the governing board"); supra Part V.D
(discussing Rosenblum and the court's interpretation of Florida law); Ga. Code
Ann. 31-7-7(a) (2002) (permitting hospitals to consider "the appropriate
utilization of hospital facilities"); Ind. Code Ann. 16-21-5(3)(C) (2004)
(allowing hospitals to set credentialing standards "that recognize the efficient
and effective utilization of hospital resources"); Iowa Code Ann. 135B.7 (2004)
(requiring written criteria to include "the necessity to grant privileges to a
practitioner authorized to provide ... cost-effective services"); N.Y. Pub.
Health Law 2801-b(1) (2002) (permitting hospitals to deny privileges consistent
with "the objectives of the institution"); N.C. Gen. Stat. 131E-85(a) (2003)
(providing that privileges shall be based upon "the reasonable objectives ... of
the hospital" and "appropriate utilization of hospital facilities"); Tenn. Code
Ann. 7-57-502(c) (found in City of Cookeville, 126 S.W.3d at 902, to permit
private act hospitals to enter into exclusive contracts "regardless of the
competitive consequences"); and Va. Code Ann. 32.1-134.1 (2004) (requiring that
reasons for denial be related to "the objectives or efficient operations of the
institution"). See also La. Rev. Stat. Ann. 1301 (2003) (authorizing hospitals
to consider the applicant's "experience"); Mo. Ann. Stat. 197.700 (West 2003)
(requiring applicants for medical staff privileges to be evaluated by "objective
criteria"). But see Raspanti & Laigaie, supra note 7, at 317 n.7 (characterizing
the statutes from Louisiana, which permit a hospital to consider the applicant's
"experience," and Virginia, which permit denials for reasons that are related to
the "efficient operations" of the hospital, as restricting, rather than
facilitating, the ability of hospitals to engage in economic credentialing). See
also id. at 317 n.8 (asserting that section 65-431 of the Kansas Annotated
Statutes (2003), which prohibits licensing agencies from interfering in
hospitals' selection of staff members, allows hospitals to engage in economic
credentialing).





n209.  N.Y. Pub. Health Law 2801-b (2002) (emphasis added).





n210.  139 A.D.2d 496 (N.Y. App. Div. 1988).





n211.  Jackaway, 139 A.D.2d at 496. While members of both "courtesy" and
"active" staffs were able to admit and treat patients in the hospital, only
members of the "active" staff could serve on committees, hold positions on the
medical staff, or vote on medical policy. Id.





n212.  Id.





n213.  Id.





n214.  Id.





n215.  Jackaway, 139 A.D.2d at 497.





n216.  Id.





n217.  Id. See also Maltz v. New York Univ. Med. Ctr., 121 A.D.2d 323 (N.Y. App.
Div. 1986). In Maltz, the plaintiff challenged the hospital's decision to deny
him staff privileges because the hospital had sufficient staffing in oncological
gastroenterology, the plaintiff's area of specialization. Id. The court found no
violation of section 2801-b of the New York Public Health Laws because the
hospital's actions were related to the hospital's objectives. Id. at 324. But
see Wee v. City of Rome, 233 A.D.2d 876, 877 (N.Y. App. Div. 1996) (finding a
cause of action for improper practices under section 2801-b based upon the
plaintiff's allegations that hospital had restricted his privileges as
retaliation for charges he levied against certain physicians); Lipsztein v.
Mount Sinai Hosp., 170 A.D.2d 285, 285-86 (N.Y. App. Div. 1991) (granting
temporary injunctive relief to the plaintiff on his claim that the hospital
violated section 2801-b by requiring the plaintiff to sever completely his
affiliation with the hospital and to apply anew for privileges if he left his
full time staff position because the court found a "serious question of fact" as
to whether the hospital had notified the plaintiff of this new policy).





n218.  The GAO, for purposes of its studies of specialty hospitals, has defined
a specialty hospital as one where "two-thirds or more of its inpatient claims
were in one or two major diagnosis categories" or where "two-thirds or more of
its inpatient claims were for surgical diagnosis-related groups." Information on
National Market Share, supra note 36, at 16.





n219.  Id. at 8-11.





n220.  Peter J. Hammer & William M. Sage, Critical Issues in Hospital Antitrust
Law: Ensuring That Hospital Competition Produces Social Benefits Depends Much
More on Regulators and Legislators Than on Courts, 22 Health Affairs 88, 93
(2003) (stating that "proponents of specialty hospitals argue that they are
better suited to use new technology and that they provide higher-quality care");
Dennis I. Kelly, Statement presented at FTC/DOJ Hearings on Health Care and
Competition Law and Policy 1, 7-8, 10 (2003), available at
http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2003/03/030326hcagenda.htm (stating that MedCath cardiac
hospitals offer more efficient scheduling of patient procedures, physicians and
staff with enhanced professional skills, a family friendly atmosphere with
unlimited visiting hours and sleeping arrangements for family members, better
patient care staffing ratios, and less moving of patients, all resulting in
patients' shorter lengths of stay and lower mortality rates).

   The AMA supports the right of physicians to refer patients to facilities in
which the physicians have ownership interests, as long as the physicians are
directly rendering the care to the patients. The AMA contends that a conflict of
interest exists only when the physicians are not personally involved in
rendering the care at the self-owned facilities. AMA, Conflicts of Interest:
Health Facility Ownership by a Physician, Formal Op. E-8.032 (last updated
1994), available at http://www.ama-assn.org/ama/pub/category/8472.html.





n221.  Certain case-based rates tend to outpace the hospitals' costs more than
others. For example, outpatient procedures, which do not require the hospital to
expend the additional costs of an overnight stay, tend to be more profitable
than inpatient procedures under the DRG system. Therefore, competing day surgery
centers tend not only to draw ambulatory surgery cases away from hospitals, but
also to draw away from hospitals the most profitable cases. E.g., Hammer & Sage,
supra note 220, at 94 (stating that "critics argue that specialty hospitals are
simply the latest scheme of cherry-picking high-end consumers").

   The differences in profitability among various DRGs suggests that the
potential for surgery centers to cherry-pick the most profitable cases might be
alleviated by adjusting the DRG values to provide a more even profit per case.
On point, as part of the recently enacted Medicare Prescription Drug,
Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003, Congress has asked the Medicare
Payment Advisory Commission ("MedPAC") to study "how the current
diagnosis-related group [DRG] system should be updated to better reflect the
cost of delivering care in a hospital setting." Pub. L. No. 108-173,
507(c)(1)(D), 117 Stat. 2066, 2297 (2003).





n222.  Letter from Beth Schermer, supra note 34, at 4.





n223.  Congressional requesters were Honorable Bill Thomas, Chairman, Committee
on Ways and Means, House of Representatives, and Honorable Jerry Kleczka, House
of Representatives. Geographic Location, supra note 35, at 1.





n224.  Information on National Market Share, supra note 36, at 5-8. The GAO
reported, at the time of publication, that an additional twenty specialty
hospitals were under development. Id. at 6.





n225.  Id. at 11-13.





n226.  Geographic Location, supra note 35, at 17-23.





n227.  Id. at 17-20.





n228.  42 U.S.C. 1395dd (2004).





n229.  EMTALA requires that when patients come to a hospital emergency
department and make a request for treatment, the hospital must provide a medical
screening exam to determine whether an emergency medical condition exists. Id.
1395dd(a). If an emergency condition is identified, then the hospital must
provide stabilizing treatment if such treatment is within the hospital's
capability, or transfer the patient to another facility that can provide such
treatment. Id. 1395dd(b).

   Hospitals have observed that because specialty hospitals are not required to
provide emergency departments (and the GAO Report confirmed that many do not),
specialty hospitals are free from the cost of EMTALA obligations. Letter from
Beth Schermer, supra note 34, at 3. See also Hammer & Sage, supra note 220, at
94 (characterizing the ability of specialty hospitals to sidestep EMTALA
mandates as a "regulatory discrepancy"); Letter from Beth Schermer, supra note
34, at 3 (referring to EMTALA's "regulatory anomaly" of requiring only general
hospitals to provide emergency services).





n230.  Geographic Location, supra note 35, at 20-23.





n231.  Id.





n232.  Id. at 23, 25-26.





n233.  Hospitals have pointed out that several regulatory mechanics also
fostered the development of specialty hospitals. In addition to their freedom,
in many cases, from EMTALA emergency treatment requirements, specialty hospitals
located in states that do not have "certificate of need" ("CON") restrictions do
not need to obtain regulatory approval before construction. See Letter from Beth
Schermer, supra note 34, at 3 (referring to the "carve out" in certain states
from CON laws).

   In addition, the Stark Law, 42 U.S.C. 1395nn, which generally prohibits
physicians from making referrals for designated Medicare-covered services to
entities with which the physicians have a financial relationship, permits
physicians to refer cases to hospitals where the physicians have invested in the
whole hospital, as opposed to a single department in the hospital. 42 U.S.C.
1395nn(d)(3)(B) (2004). This Stark exception permits physicians to send patients
to specialty hospitals that they own, thereby exacerbating the concern of
general hospitals that specialty hospitals foster "economic dumping." See Hammer
& Sage, supra note 220, at 95 (stating that "specialty hospitals exploit a
loophole in fraud-and-abuse law that allows physicians to maintain financial
interests in "whole hospitals' but not specific departments").

   Concerns articulated by hospitals about the proliferation of specialty
hospitals, and supported by the GAO Reports, resulted in a moratorium on
Stark-permitted referrals to specialty hospitals. As part of the recently
enacted Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003,
Pub. L. No. 108-173, Congress enacted an eighteen-month moratorium on the use of
the Stark whole hospital exception to most new specialty hospitals but exempted
from the moratorium specialty hospitals that were either in operation or "under
development" as of November 18, 2003. Pub. L. No. 108-173, 507, 117 Stat. 2066,
2295-2297 (2003). During the moratorium period, the Medicare Payment Advisory
Commission ("MedPAC") is to study the issues related to specialty hospitals,
including costs, services, and financial impact on general hospitals. Id.
507(c)(1), 117 Stat. at 2296-2297. Health and Human Services ("HHS") is to study
referral patterns, quality of care, and uncompensated care at specialty
hospitals. Id. 507(c)(2), 117 Stat. at 2297. Reports of these studies are to be
issued by March 2005. Id. 507(c), 117 Stat. at 2296-2297. See 42 C.F.R.
411.356(c)(3)(i) (2004) (implementing the eighteen-month moratorium into the
Stark exception for investment interests in whole hospitals).





n234.  See supra Part V.D for a discussion of these cases.





n235.  42 U.S.C. 1320a-7b (2004).





n236.  Id. 1395nn.





n237.  31 U.S.C. 3729-3733 (2004).





n238.  42 U.S.C. 1320a-7b(b).





n239.  See, e.g., OIG Special Advisory Bulletin, Offering Gifts and Other
Inducements to Beneficiaries, at 1 (Aug. 2002) [hereinafter Offering Gifts]
(noting that a concern with kickbacks is that "providers may have an economic
incentive to offset the additional costs attributable to the giveaway by
providing unnecessary services or by substituting cheaper or lower quality
services"), available at
http://oig.hhs.gov/fraud/docs/alertsandbulletins/SABGiftsandInducements.pdf; OIG
Special Fraud Alert on Rental of Space in Physician Offices by Persons or
Entities to Which Physicians Refer, 65 Fed. Reg. 9274 (Feb. 24, 2000)
[hereinafter Fraud Alert on Rental of Space] (noting that kickbacks can result
in increased costs of medical services), available at
http://oig.hhs.gov/fraud/docs/alertsandbulletins/offoce%20space.htm.





n240.  See, e.g., Publication of OIG Special Fraud Alerts, 59 Fed. Reg. 65,372,
65,375 (Dec. 19, 1994), available at
http://oig.hhs.gov/fraud/docs/alertsandbulletins/121994.htm.





n241.  42 U.S.C. 1320a-7b(b) (2004).





n242.  42 U.S.C. 1320a-7a (2004).





n243.  42 U.S.C. 13a-7(d) (2004).





n244.  United States v. Greber, 760 F.2d 68, 71 (3d Cir. 1985). See also United
States v. Kats, 871 F.2d 105, 108 (9th Cir. 1989) (holding that payment must be
"wholly and not incidentally" attributable to the referral); United States v.
Bay State Ambulance and Hosp. Rental Serv., Inc., 874 F.2d 20, 29 (1st Cir.
1989) (holding that improper purpose in making payment cannot be an incidental
or minor one).





n245.  Formerly the Health Care Financing Administration ("HCFA").





n246.  42 C.F.R. 1001.952 (2004).





n247.  Solicitation of New Safe Harbors and Special Fraud Alerts, 67 Fed. Reg.
72,894 (Dec. 9, 2002).





n248.  Id. at 72,895-96.





n249.  The OIG also asked: Does the growing control of managed care plans over
local markets, where access to patients may depend on having privileges at
particular hospitals, affect the determination whether staff privileges are
remuneration? Should the determination whether staff privileges are remuneration
turn on market circumstances? Id. at 72,895.





n250.  The OIG also asked: "Are there conditions under which [the requirement of
a physician's referral of a predetermined level of referrals to the hospital]
might be justified? Failing financial health? ... Does the level of required
referrals ... matter ... ?" Id. at 72,896.

   In addition, the OIG raised the following questions: "Should the exercise of
discretion by the privilege-granting hospital affect the analysis under the
anti-kickback statute?" Id. at 72,895.

   "Are there limits on discretion that might provide sufficient safeguards
under the anti-kickback statute?" Solicitation of New Safe Harbors and Special
Fraud Alerts, 67 Fed. Reg. at 72,896.

   "What is the effect of credentialing restrictions that apply only to members
of a group practice? What are the implications of a hospital restricting
privileges for some, but not all, members of a group practice? What about
restricting privileges of the entire group?" Id.





n251.  Id. at 72,895.





n252.  Id.





n253.  Id.





n254.  Solicitation of New Safe Harbors and Special Fraud Alerts, 67 Fed. Reg.
at 72,896. On June 8, 2004, the OIG published a Draft Supplemental Compliance
Program Guidance for Hospitals that advised hospitals to "examine their
credentialing practices to ensure that they do not run afoul of the
anti-kickback statute." 69 Fed. Reg. 32012, 32023 (June 8, 2004). The Guidance
cautioned that "conditioning privileges on a particular number of referrals or
requiring the performance of a particular number of procedures, beyond volumes
necessary to ensure clinical proficiency, potentially raise substantial risks
under the statute." Id.





n255.  Raspanti & Laigaie, supra note 7, 323-29; Marc S. Raspanti & David M.
Laigaie, Government's Next Target: Economic Credentialing by Hospitals, Legal
Intelligencer, Jan. 29, 2003, at 5, 8.





n256.  See, e.g., United States ex rel. Roy v. Anthony, 914 F. Supp. 1504,
1506-07 (S.D. Ohio 1994) (holding that the plaintiff could produce evidence to
show that the kickbacks paid to the defendant physicians rendered false the
physicians' claims for Medicare payments); United States ex rel. Thompson v.
Columbia/HCA Healthcare Corp., 20 F. Supp. 2d 1017, 1047 (S.D. Tex. 1998)
(holding that Medicare claims that were certified to be in compliance with fraud
and abuse laws could be challenged under the False Claims Act when the claims
were in violation of the Stark Self-referral law), aff'd, 125 F.3d 899, 904 (5th
Cir. 1997); United States ex rel. Pogue v. American Healthcorp, Inc., 914 F.
Supp. 1507, 1509-13 (M.D. Tenn. 1996) (stating that Medicare claims that are
tainted by kickbacks potentially violate the False Claims Act as well); see also
Raspanti & Laigaie, supra note 7 (stating that "claims resulting from an illegal
kick-back arrangement may constitute false claims, pursuant to the federal False
Claims Act"); Raspanti & Laigaie, supra note 255, at 8 (stating that "when a
hospital improperly forces a physician to refer patients in exchange for the
grant or renewal of privileges, all claims for services provided to the patient
at the hospital are false claims").





n257.  42 U.S.C. 1395nn (2004).





n258.  Id. The Stark Law is a strict liability statute, so that any referral for
designated services payable by Medicare that a physician makes to an entity with
which the physician has a financial relationship violates the law, unless the
remuneration falls into one of the statutory or regulatory exceptions. Id.
1395nn(e). In the case of economic credentialing, if a hospital's grant of staff
privileges to a physician is deemed to constitute remuneration, then the
physician would violate the statute every time he or she referred a patient to
the hospital, because the payment of the remuneration (in the form of staff
privileges) would create a financial relationship between the physician and the
hospital. Id. 1395nn(a). Currently there is no Stark exception that would cover
such referrals. See Weeks, supra note 33, at 280 (opining that if staff
privileges are deemed to constitute remuneration, then any referral to a
hospital where the referring physician has staff privileges would violate the
Stark law, with "dramatic implications for the existing healthcare delivery
system"). Compare Raspanti & Laigaie, supra note 7, at 329 (asserting that
certain economic credentialing practices potentially violate the anti-kickback
law and False Claims Act but not discussing any potential applicability of the
Stark Law).





n259.  No. CV2004-2002 (Cir. Ct. Pulaski County, Ark. Mar. 22, 2004) (order
granting preliminary injunction). See supra Part V.E for a discussion of Murphy.





n260.  Complaint P 26-32, Murphy v. Baptist Health (Cir. Ct. Pulaski County,
Ark. Feb. 24, 2004) (No. CV2004-2002).





n261.  Murphy v. Baptist Health, No. 4:04CV00112, 2004 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12080,
at 4-5 (Feb. 23, 2004).





n262.  Id.





n263.  Complaint PP 26-32, Murphy (CV2004-2002).





n264.  Murphy, No. CV2004-2002 at 5.





n265.  See supra Part V.E for a more detailed discussion of Murphy.





n266.  Complaint P 34, Murphy (No. CV2004-2002).





n267.  See, e.g., West Allis Mem'l Hosp., Inc. v. Bowen, 852 F.2d 251, 255 (7th
Cir. 1988) (holding that there is no private right of action under the federal
anti-kickback law).





n268.  See supra notes 191-97 and accompanying text for a discussion of Berasi,
wherein the plaintiffs withdrew the action upon denial of a temporary
restraining order.





n269.  See Complaint PP 34-40, Murphy (No. CV2004-2002) (relying on Arkansas
state laws to bring a private anti-kickback action to enjoin the hospital's
practices).





n270.  E.g., Virginia Radiology Assocs., P.C. v. Culpeper Mem'l Hosp., Inc., No.
906172, slip op. (4th Cir. Dec. 29, 1995) (holding that the hospital's demand of
payment from radiologists to renew their exclusive contract violated the
anti-kickback law). See also Odrich v. Trs. of Columbia Univ., 193 Misc. 2d 120,
131 (N.Y. 2002), aff'd, 308 A.D.2d 405 (N.Y. 2003) (holding that a medical
school's termination of the petitioners' faculty appointments and hospital
privileges because of the petitioners' refusal to pay a "Dean's Tax" of ten
percent of their private practice income constituted unlawful fee splitting);
Hauptman v. Grand Manor Health Related Facility, Inc., 121 A.D.2d 151, 154 (N.Y.
1986) (finding that a nursing home's demand of twenty percent of the fees
collected by physicians providing medical care to the residents constituted
unlawful fee splitting); OIG Special Fraud Alert, 59 Fed. Reg. 65,372, 65,376
(Dec. 19, 1994) (stating that free or discounted services or office space,
below-interest loans, payments for medical education, and income guarantees may
constitute remuneration for anti-kickback purposes).





n271.  Offering Gifts, supra note 239, at 1; Fraud Alert on Rental of Space,
supra note 239, at 9275 (noting that payment of kickbacks for referrals
encourages physicians to order services based on profit rather than patient
need).





n272.  OIG Management Advisory Report: Financial Arrangements Between Hospitals
and Hospital-Based Physicians (Oct. 1991), available at
http://oig.hhs.gov/oei/reports/oei-09-89-00330.pdf.





n273.  See Letter from Rick Pollack, supra note 57, at 1 (explaining why a
hospital's grant of staff privileges to physicians should not be treated as
remuneration); Letter from Beth Schermer, supra note 34, at 5 (explaining the
distinction that the OIG has recognized between medical staff credentialing and
referral mandates).

   There are other indications of the OIG's position that staff privileges,
standing alone, do not constitute remuneration. The anti-kickback safe harbor
for physician recruitment excludes any staff privileges arrangements whereby the
physician is required to make referrals to the hospital. 42 C.F.R.
1001.952(n)(4). This implies that other staff privileges arrangements, such as
conflict of interest policies, do not foreclose use of the physician recruitment
safe harbor. See Letter from Beth Schermer, supra note 34, at 5 (explaining that
only requirements that induce a physician to refer patients to the hospital fall
outside the safe harbor provision). In addition, the anti-kickback safe harbor
for multi-specialty ambulatory surgery centers ("ASC") requires physician owners
to perform at least one-third of their procedures at the ASC. 42 C.F.R.
1001.952(r)(3)(iii). This requirement suggests that the ASCs will need to limit
non-ownership staff privileges at the ASC, or the physician owners might be
unable to perform sufficient procedures at the ASC to satisfy the one-third
requirement. Denying staff privileges for this reason should not subject a
physician owner to anti-kickback risk. See Letter from Beth Schermer, supra note
34, at 7 (noting that denial of facility access by physician owners to other
physicians in order to meet administrative goals or to assure sufficient access
to operating and procedure rooms should not be construed as a violation of
anti-kickback law). Finally, in its recent publication of the Interim Final
Stark Law Phase II rule, 69 Fed. Reg. 16,054, the OIG reiterated that
"reasonable credentialing restrictions on physicians becoming competitors of a
hospital" do not foreclose the use of the Stark physician recruitment exception.
Interim Final Rule for the Stark Act II, 69 Fed. Reg. at 16,095 (Mar. 26, 2004),
available at
http://a257.g.akamaitech.net/7/257/2422/14mar200/0800/edocket.access.gpo.gov/200
4/pdf104-6668.pdf.





n274.  See Letter from Beth Schermer, supra note 34, at 7 (observing that
denials of staff privileges to physicians with conflicts of interests "would
have the effect of limiting physician referrals to the hospital, rather than
inducing additional referrals").





n275.  Concomitantly, any referrals by a physician to a hospital that has
granted the physician staff privileges would violate the Stark Law. See supra
Part VIII.A for a discussion of the application of the Stark Law.





n276.  See Greber, 760 F.2d at 71 (holding that the anti-kickback law is
violated if one purpose of the remuneration is to induce referrals); Raspanti &
Laigaie, supra note 7, at 324-25 (stating that "if any one consideration in a
hospital's credentialing decision is to ensure future revenues through patient
admissions, then it has potentially violated the anti-kickback statute"); see
also Eve H. Goldstein, An Analysis of Medical Staff Credentialing As
Remuneration Under The Anti-Kickback Statute, 8 Health L. News 6 (arguing that
the defect of the theory that some forms of economic credentialing violate the
anti-kickback law is that, since credentialing undeniably has value to
physicians, and since credentials undeniably are conferred by hospitals to
induce referrals, all forms of credentialing, on their face, violate the
anti-kickback law).





n277.  See Letter from Rick Pollack, supra note 57, at 4 (stating that Congress,
CMS, and the OIG "clearly have taken the view that staff privileges are
distinguishable from those hospital benefits that are subject to the Stark
Law").





n278.  Solicitation of New Safe Harbors and Special Fraud Alerts, 67 Fed. Reg.
at 72,894, 72,895. See also Physicians' Referrals to Health Care Entities With
Which They Have Financial Relationships, 66 Fed. Reg. 856, 878 (differentiating
between requirements to make referrals and agreements not to establish a
competing business and stating that "if an agreement also included the
requirement that the physician refer business ... the agreement would be suspect
under the anti-kickback statute"). See also Raspanti & Laigaie, supra note 7, at
327 (asserting that the anti-kickback statute applies when a hospital grants
staff privileges in exchange for a promise by the physician to refer more or all
of the physician's patients to the hospital).





n279.  See Raspanti & Laigaie, supra note 7, at 324 (describing the practice of
trading privileges for the promise of patient admissions); Weeks, supra note 33,
at 323 (stating that hospital policies that condition privileges on physicians'
agreeing to refer patients to the hospitals can be viewed "more easily" as
paying remuneration for referrals); Letter from Beth Schermer, supra note 34, at
1 (conceding that "remuneration may exist in a limited range of situations where
credentialing is directly linked to referral requirements"). But see
HortySpringer Publications, Hortyspringer White Paper, Hospital Responses to
Physician Competition, at 8 (2003) (opining that medical staff appointments do
not confer monetary value on physicians because the appointments have no
independent value, citing to OIG Advisory letters dated July 3, 1997 and August
4, 1997, which state that free computers from labs that can be used only to
print lab tests have "no independent value" apart from the service being
provided, so that the free computers do not constitute remuneration to
physicians, while free biopsy needles from labs do have independent value, so
that giving biopsy needles to physicians is suspect).

   The OIG asks in its solicitation for comments whether the control of a local
market by a managed care plan, or other market characteristics, affects the
analysis of whether staff privileges are remuneration. See supra Part VIII.A for
a discussion of the OIG's solicitation of public comments on the link between
certain credentialing practices and the anti-kickback law. Determining market
power, however, is appropriate to antitrust, not fraud and abuse, analysis. If
physicians need to participate in a particular managed care plan because the
plan controls access to patients in a given region, and the managed care plan
requires its participating physicians to have staff privileges at a particular
hospital, then those are relevant factors in determining whether the hospital
has market power. Under such circumstances, an unduly restrictive conflict of
interest policy implemented by the hospital might violate the antitrust law. See
Letter from Beth Schermer, supra note 34, at 6-7 (explaining that limiting a
physician's ability to provide care for a patient may violate anti-trust law);
Weeks, supra note 33, at 276 (suggesting that the OIG's idea of determining
whether staff privileges constitute remuneration based on market factors is
problematic because tying the determination of remuneration to market analysis
would create "considerable uncertainty").





n280.  See, e.g., OIG Special Fraud Alert, Hospital Incentives to Physicians, 59
Fed. Reg. 65,372, 65,375 (Dec. 19, 1994) (stating that referral mandates can
interfere with physicians' judgments, causing them to decide between facilities
offering the best patient care and facilities providing financial incentives for
the physician).





n281.  See Weeks, supra note 33, at 276 (stating that "credentialing alone
should not be viewed as "remuneration' because of the permissive nature of
medical staff privileges, which allow, but do not require, a physician to use
hospital facilities."); Letter from Beth Schermer, supra note 34, at 5 (stating
that staff privileges create a permissive relationship between a physician and
facility, whereby physicians are permitted, but not required, to use the
hospital's facilities).

   A more difficult question is whether hospitals offend the anti-kickback law
when they limit physicians' ability to obtain staff privileges at other
hospitals. This practice has become known as "exclusive credentialing." See
Allen Neurosurgical Assocs., Inc. v. Lehigh Valley Health Network, 2001 U.S.
Dist. LEXIS 284, at 3 (E.D. Pa. Jan. 18, 2001) (referring to a practice that
required member, or potential member, physicians to agree to admit patients only
to particular hospitals as an "exclusive credentialing" scheme). Under the
analysis above, even an exclusive grant of privileges, as long as the grant does
not expressly require the physician to make a given volume or value of
referrals, might not result in any referrals. Therefore, it would not appear to
violate the anti-kickback law per se. This does not necessarily mean, however,
that exclusive credentialing policies would not be subject to fraud challenge.
Where it could be established that a particular physician's practice necessarily
requires hospital admissions (cardiac surgeon), then requiring exclusive
privileges would be tantamount to a referral mandate. And once again, where a
hospital has market power, and its exclusive credentialing policy forecloses the
ability of other hospitals to attract sufficient staff physicians to operate,
such a policy could be challenged under the antitrust laws. Finally, states
could promulgate laws barring such practices. See, e.g., Cal. Welf. & Inst. Code
14087.28 (prohibiting determinations of staff privileges based on whether the
physicians have contracts with other hospitals); R.I. Gen. Laws 23-17-53
(prohibiting hospitals' grants of staff privileges conditioned on physicians'
relationships with other hospitals); Tex. Health & Safety Code 241.1015
(prohibiting hospitals from granting or renewing staff privileges based on
physicians' relationships with other hospitals). But see Baxter, supra note 23,
at 101-02 (observing that some commentators predict a proliferation of exclusive
contracting in the future, along with widespread acceptance of economic
credentialing).





n282.  See Weeks, supra note 33, at 276 (stating that "an economic
conflict-of-interest policy that conditions medical staff membership on a
physician's agreeing to refrain from owning or investing in a competitive
facility should not be considered remunerative as long as there is no referral
requirement"). This conclusion that conflict of interest policies do not offend
the anti-kickback law is also in keeping with the general antitrust principle
that an entity has no duty to aid competitors. See, e.g., Verizon Communications
Inc. v. Law Offices of Curtis V. Trinko, LLP, 124 S. Ct. 872, 880-81 (2004)
(explaining that Verizon's alleged insufficient assistance to rivals is not a
recognized antitrust claim and that the court has never recognized such a
doctrine). Indeed, physicians' complaints that competitive credentialing
interferes with physicians' freedom to make referrals based upon medical
judgment rings somewhat hollow. It can be argued that the medical judgment of
physicians who have conflicts of interest, such as ownership interests in
competing facilities, is already "tainted" when those physicians make referrals,
because those physicians' profit motives may already be significant factors in
their referral decisions.





n283.  The OIG appears to concede that hospital policies that require a minimum
number of referrals deemed to be necessary for clinical proficiency are not an
anti-kickback concern. Solicitation of New Safe Harbors and Special Fraud
Alerts, 67 Fed. Reg. at 72,895. Accord United States ex rel. Perales v. St.
Margaret's Hosp., 243 F. Supp. 2d 843, 864 (C.D. Ill. 2003) (holding that there
had been no showing that limiting "active staff" status to those physicians with
higher usage of the hospital was "an improper referral requirement in sheep's
clothing."). See also Hudson, supra note 168, at 40 (noting that Florida
hospitals routinely ask physicians to make a certain number of admissions, so
that the hospitals have enough data to measure the physicians' service quality).





n284.  See Letter from Beth Schermer, supra note 34, at 8 (recommending the
adoption of a policy that would assure that hospitals employing credentialing
policies "based upon legitimate quality of care, administrative and business
concerns" will not be charged with violating fraud and abuse laws).

   In its request for comments, the OIG asked whether a conflict of interest
should be defined as an ownership, employment, or contractor status.
Solicitation of New Safe Harbors and Special Fraud Alerts, 67 Fed. Reg. at
72,895. See also Geographic Location, supra note 35, at 9 (reporting that
approximately seventy-three percent of physicians with admitting privileges to
specialty hospitals were not investors in the hospitals). But if conflict of
interest policies are deemed not to offend the fraud and abuse laws, then the
manner in which a hospital defines a conflict of interest also should not incur
fraud exposure. Accordingly, a hospital would be free to define a conflict as an
ownership interest, a staff leadership position, or an employment status.
However, it bears noting that the antitrust laws would be applicable
nonetheless. An unduly restrictive competitive credentialing policy by a
hospital with market power, where the competitive harm outweighs the business
rationale articulated by the hospital, or where the policy implemented by the
hospital is not the least restrictive alternative, could incur antitrust risk.





n285.  See Blum, supra note 26, at 256 (stating that the "mere application of
economic criteria in the credentialing process ... should not inherently lead to
violation of antitrust laws"); Hagen, supra note 75, at 454 (stating that "when
economic credentialing is properly administered, there are no inherent
violations of antitrust").





n286.  See supra Part V for a discussion of cases that have challenged economic
credentialing.





n287.  See supra Part VI for a discussion of state laws on economic
credentialing.





n288.  See supra Part VIII for a discussion of whether competitive credentialing
violates the fraud and abuse laws.





n289.  See supra note 233 for a discussion of the moratorium on Stark permitted
referrals to specialty hospitals and the reasoning behind the moratorium. A
joint FTC/DOJ report recently issued on healthcare competition states that "the
results of [these] two Congressionally mandated studies on the industry are
likely to affect the future development of those hospitals." Federal Trade
Commission and Department of Justice, Improving Health Care: A Dose of
Competition, ch. 3 at 18 (July 2004), available at
http://www.ftc.gov/reports/healthcare/040723_heathcarerpt.pdf.





n290.  See supra Part VIII.A for a discussion of the solicitation of comments by
the OIG. See also Weeks, supra note 33, at 38 (questioning how the OIG will
respond to the comments).





n291.  Murphy v. Baptist Health, No. CV2004-2002 (Cir. Ct. Ark. Mar. 22, 2004)
(order granting preliminary injunction); see discussion supra Part V.E.





n292.  Complaint PP 22-24, Murphy (No. CV2004-2002).





n293.  See supra notes 180-86 and accompanying text for a discussion of the
Murphy court's reasoning in granting a preliminary injunction.





n294.  Complaint P 23, Murphy (No. CV2004-2002).





n295.  Murphy, No. CV2004-2002 (order granting preliminary injunction).





n296.  No. 04CVA-03-2406; see discussion supra note 4 and Part V.E.





n297.  See supra notes 191-98 and accompanying text for a discussion of Berasi.





n298.  See supra Parts V.B-E for a discussion of cases challenging competitive
credentialing.





n299.  See supra Parts V.A-D for a discussion of antitrust hurdles and cases in
which physicians raised anti-trust challenges to economic credentialing.





n300.  See supra Part VIII.B for a discussion of when a grant of privileges
might constitute remuneration, a necessary element of an anti-kickback
violation.





n301.  See Alan Arville, Physician Investments in For-Profit Specialty Hospitals
Raise Novel Economic Credentialing Issues, at
http://www.szd.com/services/health/physician_investments.html (last visited Nov.
13, 2004) (stating that "the deciding factor, and ultimate battleground ...
could be ... whether the denial of privileges injures the public").





n302.  G. Edward Alexander, Jr., Testimony to the Joint Federal Trade Commission
and Department of Justice Hearings on Health Care and Competition Law and Policy
(Mar. 27, 2003), available at http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2003/03/030326hcagenda.htm
(quoting from a July 22, 2002 article in Modern Healthcare by David Burda:
"Nothing could be better for patients ... than to have an array of specialty and
full-service hospitals of various ownership models in their market to serve all
their healthcare needs.").





n303.  See Letter from Beth Schermer, supra note 34, at 3 (stating that "while
hospitals were often viewed in the past as quasi-public facilities essential to
a physician's ability to practice his or her profession, they are now just one
of many facilities providing medical services").


